








Douglas L. Jacobs - Executive Bio, Compensation History, and Contacts - Equilar Atlas










 

















Log in | Sign up








x

 






As Featured In



















Douglas L. Jacobs
Board Member at Fortress Investment Group LLC


View Full Profile
Are you Douglas L. Jacobs? Claim your profile


 


Sign up for Equilar Atlas and view Douglas L. Jacobs's full profile. 
With Equilar Atlas, you can:



IDENTIFY corporate executives in Douglas L. Jacobs's  network and community.
												FOLLOW changes in Douglas L. Jacobs's employment and money-in-motion.
												CONNECT with Douglas L. Jacobs through your network of contacts.
												








Douglas L. Jacobs's Executive Work History


Current


Board Member, 
OneMain Holdings, Inc.


Board Member, 
Fortress Investment Group LLC


Past
To view Douglas L. Jacobs's complete executive work history, sign up now
Education


														 B.A., 
															Amherst College


														 M.B.A., 
															University of Pennsylvania


Age
69

 
 


Douglas L. Jacobs's Biography



Douglas L. Jacobs has been a member of the Board of Directors since February 2007. Mr. Jacobs is a director of Clear Channel Outdoor Holdings, Inc., an outdoor advertising company where he serves as Chairman of the Audit Committee and a member of the Compensation Committee. Mr. Jacobs is also a director of OneMain Holdings, Inc., a consumer finance company where he is Chairman of the Audit Committee. Mr. Jacobs is also a director of New Residential Investment Corp., a public real estate investment trust where he is Chairman of the Audit Committee. From November 2004 to mid-2008, Mr. Jacobs was also a director of ACA Capital Holdings, Inc., a  ...
(Read More)

			Douglas L. Jacobs has been a member of the Board of Directors since February 2007. Mr. Jacobs is a director of Clear Channel Outdoor Holdings, Inc., an outdoor advertising company where he serves as Chairman of the Audit Committee and a member of the Compensation Committee. Mr. Jacobs is also a director of OneMain Holdings, Inc., a consumer finance company where he is Chairman of the Audit Committee. Mr. Jacobs is also a director of New Residential Investment Corp., a public real estate investment trust where he is Chairman of the Audit Committee. From November 2004 to mid-2008, Mr. Jacobs was also a director of ACA Capital Holdings, Inc., a financial guaranty company, where he was Chairman of the Audit Committee and a member of the Compensation Committee and Risk Management Committees. From 2009 until 2015 Mr. Jacobs was a director of Doral Financial Corporation, a financial services company. Mr. Jacobs was a director and Chairman of the Audit Committee for Global Signal Inc. from February 2004 until January 2007. Mr. Jacobs has also been a director of Hanover Capital Mortgage Holdings, Inc. from 2003 until 2007. From 1988 to 2003, Mr. Jacobs was at FleetBoston Financial Group, where he became an Executive Vice President and Treasurer responsible for managing the company's funding, securitization, capital, and asset and liability management activities in addition to its securities, derivatives, and mortgage loan portfolios. Prior to joining FleetBoston, Mr. Jacobs was active in a variety of positions at Citicorp over 17 years, culminating in his role as Division Executive of the Mortgage Finance Group. Mr. Jacobs holds a B.A. from Amherst College and an M.B.A. from the Wharton School of Business at the University of Pennsylvania. Mr. Jacobs's finance and management expertise, experience serving on public company boards and committees and deep familiarity with our Company led our Board of Directors to conclude that Mr. Jacobs should be elected to serve as a director.
		
Source: Fortress Investment Group LLC on 04/28/2017
		
	

 






Sign up for Equilar Atlas and view Douglas L. Jacobs's full profile. 



												By accessing Equilar Atlas, you can view bios, network, salary and wealth events
												of industry-leading executives like Douglas L. Jacobs. More specifically, you'll be able to:
												

IDENTIFY corporate executives in Douglas L. Jacobs's  network and community.
												FOLLOW changes in Douglas L. Jacobs's employment and money-in-motion.
												CONNECT with Douglas L. Jacobs through your network of conections.
												




View Full Profile


 








Search for over 360,000 executive profiles.





/bio



													Example: Douglas L. Jacobs


















Douglas L. Jacobs's Connections (144)





Sign up now to view Douglas L. Jacobs's 144 connections »









Jerry V. Elliott
Former President and Chief Operating Officer, Leap Wireless International Inc.









William H. Lacy
Former Chairman and Chief Executive Officer of the Company and Chairman of MGIC, MGIC Investment Corporation









Glen R. Wakeman
Former Board Member, Doral Financial Corporation









Roy A. Guthrie
Lead Independent Director, OneMain Holdings, Inc.









Kevin M. Twomey
Former President and Chief Operating Officer, The St. Joe Company









Mark S. Whiting
Board Member, Capstead Mortgage Corporation









Bradford D. Borchers
Executive Vice President, Branch Operations, OneMain Holdings, Inc.









Robert I. Kauffman
Former Principal, Fortress Investment Group LLC









Howard Rubin
Former Board Member, Fortress Investment Group LLC









Suzette N. Berrios
Former Senior Vice President, Roma Financial








Popular Profiles






														Sign up now to view more executive profiles »
														









Thomas J. Lynch
Executive Chairman, TE Connectivity Ltd.









John J. Kita
EVP and CFO, A. O. Smith









Elon R. Musk
CEO and Chairman, Tesla









Daniel A. DeMatteo
Executive Chairman, GameStop Corp.









David J. O'Connor
President and CEO, The Madison Square Garden Company












×

Claim Your Profile Coming Soon
Interested in updating your biography and work history?
We're working on making it happen.
We'll email you when this feature is available.
Please enter valid email address.

Done


Thank you for your interest.
Ok






			Browse executive profiles:
			
				 A
			
				 B
			
				 C
			
				 D
			
				 E
			
				 F
			
				 G
			
				 H
			
				 I
			
				 J
			
				 K
			
				 L
			
				 M
			
				 N
			
				 O
			
				 P
			
				 Q
			
				 R
			
				 S
			
				 T
			
				 U
			
				 V
			
				 W
			
				 X
			
				 Y
			
				 Z



Equilar Homepage
Equilar Atlas
Equilar Insight
Equilar BoardEdge
Equilar Engage
Research Services
Knowledge Network
About Us
Login

� 2017 Equilar All Rights Reserved. Privacy Policy
1100 Marshall Street, Redwood City, CA 94063 | Phone (650) 241-6600 | Fax (650) 701-0993














	Home | Jacobs











































































                        Good Evening
Imagine the possibilities of what we can do for you. Get to know one of the world’s largest and most diverse providers of technical professional and construction services.

© British Airways i360






                        Good Evening
Imagine the possibilities of what we can do for you. Get to know one of the world’s largest and most diverse providers of technical professional and construction services.







                        Good Evening
Imagine the possibilities of what we can do for you. Get to know one of the world’s largest and most diverse providers of technical professional and construction services.







                        Good Evening
Imagine the possibilities of what we can do for you. Get to know one of the world’s largest and most diverse providers of technical professional and construction services.







                        Good Evening
Imagine the possibilities of what we can do for you. Get to know one of the world’s largest and most diverse providers of technical professional and construction services.







                        Good Evening
Imagine the possibilities of what we can do for you. Get to know one of the world’s largest and most diverse providers of technical professional and construction services.







                        Good Evening
Imagine the possibilities of what we can do for you. Get to know one of the world’s largest and most diverse providers of technical professional and construction services.







                        Good Evening
Imagine the possibilities of what we can do for you. Get to know one of the world’s largest and most diverse providers of technical professional and construction services.







                        Good Evening
Imagine the possibilities of what we can do for you. Get to know one of the world’s largest and most diverse providers of technical professional and construction services.







                        Good Evening
Imagine the possibilities of what we can do for you. Get to know one of the world’s largest and most diverse providers of technical professional and construction services.







                        Good Evening
Imagine the possibilities of what we can do for you. Get to know one of the world’s largest and most diverse providers of technical professional and construction services.







                        Good Evening
Imagine the possibilities of what we can do for you. Get to know one of the world’s largest and most diverse providers of technical professional and construction services.











 




Apply for a job




See our open positions and tell us about yourself.
Apply now | View hot jobs


 




Sustainability




At Jacobs, we see sustainability differently.

Learn more about sustainability










 




News



 








See more news | Investors area



Join Now
Live Webcast:
Q2 Results Earnings Call Webcast
May 9, 2017 at 11 a.m. EST
























Return to top




Contact us
File transfer
Company store
Privacy & terms
© 2017 Jacobs. All rights reserved.









	Join us | Jacobs




































































 



Working here








Where can your career take you?





At Jacobs, we help prepare people for new opportunities and challenges in their careers. With positions at every level, openings in multiple disciplines, expertise in a range of markets and offices around the globe, we create an environment where you can learn, grow, and thrive. 
If you share our commitment to doing what's best for clients, enjoy working in teams and hold yourself to the highest ethical standards, you'll fit right in.

View our latest hot jobs
See what services we provide
Find out where we are located
Explore the industries we serve
See how we help clients
Tour our project gallery
Learn more through our summary annual report
Interact with our projects using JacobsWorld






Apply now










Careers on the move
                











Hot jobs
                




 
 
 


Information TechnologyCraft ProfessionalsNetwork & IT SpecialistsEnvironmental

« Back





We have jobs for you!


   Information TechnologyMonday, June 26, 2017  -  US Learn more » Hot Job     Craft ProfessionalsMonday, June 12, 2017  -  Alberta & Saskatchewan, Canada Learn more » Hot Job     Network & IT SpecialistsMonday, June 05, 2017  -  Virginia, Maryland Learn more » Hot Job     EnvironmentalMonday, May 01, 2017  -  Alaska Learn more » Hot Job  



With positions at every level, openings in multiple disciplines, expertise in a range of markets and offices around the globe, Jacobs creates an environment where you can learn, grow, and thrive. Our Hot Jobs feature a few current openings by location or discipline with the hope of reaching the qualified, interested persons ready for the next challenge in their career. To view all available jobs, please Apply for a Job. 







 Hot Job    Information Technology Posted on Monday, June 26, 2017  |  Location: US    Share this hot job            
Jacobs is seeking various IT professionals to support a number of government clients across the United States.  These positions will enable the success of the US Department of Defense (DOD) and other governmental organizations by providing unmatched systems life-cycle solutions.

A few of our positions include:



 
Position
Location
Reference Number





Software Engineer / Web Developer
Elgin AFB, FL
SAL0001CW



Microsoft SharePoint Developer / SME
Elgin AFB, FL
SAL0001CX



Senior Range Threat Engineer
Hill AFB, UT
SAL00013E



Army SSR
Huntsville, AL
SAL0001AR



Lead Software Developer
Point Mugu, CA
SAL00016N



Control & Data Acquisition System (CDAS) Specialist
Ridgecrest, CA
SAL0001CY



IT Deskside Support Admin
Warren, MI
SAL0000W9


To view more selected IT opportunities please click the links below:

Selected IT Jobs

 Connect with us  Hot Job    Craft Professionals Posted on Monday, June 12, 2017  |  Location: Alberta & Saskatchewan, Canada    Share this hot job            
Jacobs is seeking skilled industrial construction and maintenance tradespeople for positions in Vanscoy, Saskatchewan and Carseland, Alberta for shutdown and turnaround work as we grow our maintenance team in Canada.

A few of our positions include:



 
Position
Location
Reference Number





Journeyman Boilermakers
Carseland, AB
FS 0001QS



Pipefitters
Carseland, AB
FS 0001WM



Welders
Carseland, AB
FS 0001QV



Iron Workers
Carseland, AB
FS 0001Y5



Journeyman Boilermakers
Vanscoy, SK
FS 0001QR



Pipefitters
Vanscoy, SK
FS 0001QH



Welders
Vanscoy, SK
FS 0001QQ



Millwrights
Vanscoy, SK
FS 0001QG



Iron Workers
Vanscoy, SK
FS 0001Z3


To view all craft jobs in Canada, click the link below:

Craft Jobs in Canada

 Connect with us  Hot Job    Network & IT Specialists Posted on Monday, June 05, 2017  |  Location: Virginia, Maryland    Share this hot job            Jacobs is seeking Network Engineers and IT Specialists to support a number of government clients in Northern Virginia and Maryland.  These positions require an active TS/SCI with Polygraph clearance.
A few of our positions include:



 
Position
Location
Reference Number





Systems & Test Engineer I
Columbia, MD
I2S00018Z



Network Designer
Reston, VA
I2S00016S



Network Engineer
Reston, VA
I2S0001CJ



Network Engineer
Reston, VA
I2S00016B



Software Engineer
Reston, VA
I2S0001GO



Senior Financial Analyst
Reston, VA
I2S00013G



Data Analyst
Reston, VA
I2S0001CL



Circuit Design and Documentation Specialist
Reston, VA
I2S0001HW



Network Engineer Tier 3
Reston, VA
I2S0001DR



Receiving/Project Support Specialist
Springfield, VA
I2S00014Y


To view more of our current IT opportunities please click the links below:

Virginia IT Jobs
Washington DC/Maryland IT Jobs

 Connect with us  Hot Job    Environmental Posted on Monday, May 01, 2017  |  Location: Alaska    Share this hot job            Jacobs is seeking environmental professionals for our growing team in Alaska.  Jobs include: 

Environmental Project Manager
Environmental Engineer
Environmental Scientist
Geologist
Chemist
Subcontract Administrator

To view these jobs, click the link below:

Jobs in Alaska
 Connect with us 





 



Grow with us
                








We want you to succeed.





Jacobs takes great pride in creating an ethical, safe, and healthy environment where all employees can learn, grow, and thrive, both personally and professionally. We offer a number of opportunities to get started with us, even while still in school; grow into new challenges as you progress; keep your career advancing as you are ready to take on more; and be involved with or potentially lead exciting and innovative projects that help change the world.







Employee networks
Internships & apprenticeships
Graduate opportunities
Training & development
Craft programs
Benefits






To support our varied backgrounds, talents, skills, and styles Jacobs offers a number of employee networks to allow people to connect, collaborate, and develop. We believe a diverse workplace energizes people and encourages creativity, collaboration, and innovation. 

Offering a variety of events, mentorships, trainings, and collaborative discussions, our employee networks include:

Jacobs Future Network - For early career professionals, this group provides professional networking and development of early career skills. The employee-led network helps members see the opportunities available at Jacobs, feel connected to the company and their global colleagues, gain exposure to leaders, and help them shape and fulfill their career aspirations.  
Jacobs Next Network - Following the Jacobs Future Network, this group targets employees with 6-10 years of experience and provides the next level for deepening professional networks and leveraging those networks for further career development. Members gain exposure to senior leaders, further explore potential career paths, work on more targeted development, and play a role in advising leaders on how to improve areas of our business.
Jacobs Women's Network - Addresses unique challenges women may face in the industry, strengthens connections with women in leadership positions at Jacobs and other companies, and provides a forum for development and exposure to senior leaders in the company.
Communities of Practice (CoPs) - Arranged by lines of business, markets, and disciplines, our CoPs offer employees with similar technical backgrounds and skills, a place to meet, connect, and share best practices within their areas. Geared toward collaboration, our CoPs cross industries and geographies to contribute ideas and innovations with peers.

By embracing and appreciating our similarities and our differences, Jacobs networks foster an environment that allows everyone to reach their full potential.



















As a student, Jacobs internships, co-ops, and apprenticeships provide you an opportunity to gain real-world, practical experience in your area of expertise, while helping us meet our future leaders and innovators.
Jacobs wants you to gain experience early, grow your skills while still in school, and develop a career with us from the start. We believe you have talent and value that is critical to our growth and success.
Working in a fast-paced, professional setting can give you invaluable experiences applying the knowledge and skills learned through education in a business environment. As an intern you have the opportunity to work alongside and in support of a group of world-class professionals in your chosen field of study. The program's goal is to lead you to full-time employment with us.
Internships and co-op positions vary by location, but in general you can:

Work with a mentor who assigns project tasks, offers guidance and answers questions about the industry
Work on exciting projects with variety of team members with different backgrounds, experience levels, and technical knowledge
Visit construction and job sites to see how our projects come together in the real world
Get involved with local professional associations to expand your network
Interact with local Jacobs leadership to understand the business side of our work
Attend various office-level lunch-and-learns and events
Get hands-on experience with the latest professional services design and management software
Network with other students – locally, nationally and globally

 Learn more about how others have developed a career with us.




Jacobs believes in investing in our graduates and early career professionals. Graduates are invited to join the Jacobs Future Network, designed to get you started right with your career plans, skills, and long-term development. Our network can help you see the opportunities available at Jacobs, become connected to the company and your global colleagues, gain exposure to leaders, and help shape and fulfill your career aspirations.
The network serves thousands of employees through virtual networking, growth opportunities, and events. Our annual Jacobs Future Weekend events offer participants an opportunity to meet their peers from around the world, meet our senior leaders, develop professional skills through team building exercises, and set goals for the future.
The driving force behind the network are the local Jacobs Future groups, which are led by our members – offering early leadership and management opportunities. Local chapters provide an opportunity for in-person connections; skills training, networking events, mentoring, and social events. We currently have more than 60 local programs around the world, and through the energy, engagement, and enthusiasm of our employees, that number is growing every day.





















As your career progresses, Jacobs offers continuing education, training, and advancement. We want you to have a long career with us and we are committed to investing in your future.
Our ongoing development activities are aimed at all levels of our organization and are an important component to your long-term success with us. 
At a local level, Jacobs offices and regions provide a variety of learning opportunities ranging from online training modules and hands-on software training, to lunch and learn events, education reimbursement programs, and individual development planning sessions.
Our established programs can help you deepen your understanding of our business approach, as well as enhance your ability to lead, train, and develop others. Courses and growth opportunities include: 

Jacobs College - immersion training in Business Leadership, Business Acumen, Project Management, Management Leadership, Relationship Based Sales, Presentation Skills, and others
Continuing education classes furthering your technical certifications, accreditations, skills, and knowledge
On-the-job project experience
Grow your skills workshops
Safety workshops
Annual business meeting
Annual Inclusion conference
And a variety of courses covering Jacobs’ culture, values, ethics, and risk management programs

We want you to have a challenging and exciting career at Jacobs. Join us today!
























As a craft, trade, or construction and maintenance employee, Jacobs offers you programs designed specifically for a career in the field. We continue to look for ways to help you develop and elevate your skills that will keep you with us until you retire. Jacobs targets the military, local Workforce Investment Boards, unions, and other networks to find skilled and talented craft professionals to help deliver our projects around the world.
Believing that you should “earn while you learn,” Jacobs' on-the-job Craft development programs include:

Helper Progression – To prepare you for the journeyman ranks, this initiative trains employees at four levels, including a skills assessments and competency test.
Journeyman Progression and Certification – A training program to prepare you for the NCCER Written and Performance Assessment which earns you the industry-recognized NCCER Certified Plus credentials. Read more about Jacobs' Journeyman Certification Program, in the March 2016 issue of the Industrial Projects Report.
Welder Development – As a structural welder, you can go through this program to learn new process knowledge, skills, and techniques – ultimately earning a “Golden Arm Welder” status.
Leadership Academy – This initiative identifies “high potential” journeymen and through formal training and on-the-job experience, develops them to become construction leaders and can end with site management responsibilities. 

See what opportunities we have available in field services - apply with us today.


Our culture of caring focuses on supporting you as you develop your career with Jacobs. We want you to succeed, have a long and exciting career path, while also having and maintaining a family at home. Jacobs' primary benefits package can help you — and your families — stay healthy, save for their future, and enjoy a balanced work/life schedule.
Specific benefits vary from country to country, but typically include:

Flexible work schedules and opportunities to work remotely
Tuition reimbursement
Retirement benefits
Employee stock purchase plan
Health benefits
Disability benefits
Life and accident insurance
Paid time off and paid holidays











 



Apply for a job
                








Ready for a job with us?





Search and apply for both staff and craft/trade jobs with Jacobs across all disciplines and markets worldwide.






Staff jobs:


Apply



 



Craft/Trades jobs:




                            Select Country
                        


Canada
United Kingdom
United States



Canada
Building Trades
Apply online
 
Non-Building Trades
Apply online


United States:
Apply online or call +1.866.780.2028.

Arizona: press 5
California: press 3
Colorado: press 1
Louisiana: press 1
New Mexico: press 5
Tennessee: press 4
Texas: press 2












Have a question about jobs at Jacobs?
                                        Here are common questions we hear from people wanting to work at Jacobs. Click or tap a question to reveal the answer.









Do you have any jobs that fit my experience and interest?
                                                    




                                                    All jobs for which we are accepting applications can be found at Jacobs – Apply for a Job.  Search for jobs by keyword, job number and/or location.
                                                





How do I apply to jobs at Jacobs?
                                                    




                                                    All jobs for which we are accepting applications can found at Jacobs – Apply for a Job.  Search for jobs by keyword, job number and/or location.  Apply to any jobs that match your qualifications and interest.

                                                





How do I reset my password?
                                                    




Jacobs has transitioned to a new recruiting system. You may need to create a new profile and login to apply to jobs if you applied to Jacobs prior to June - November 2015.
If you have applied to jobs after that time, but have forgotten your login information, please visit Jacobs – Apply for a Job, and at the sign-in page, click Forgot your user name? or Forgot your password? as appropriate.  If you do not receive such an e-mail within a few minutes at the e-mail address with which you registered, look in your junk mail folder or spam filter.






What is the status of my application?
                                                    




                                                    Visit Jacobs – Apply for a Job, sign in and click the My Jobpage tab just below the welcome message to view all completed submissions and current status of each.
                     

                                                





What is the status of the job to which I applied?
                                                    




                                                    Visit Jacobs – Apply for a Job, sign in and click the My Jobpage tab just below the welcome message to view all jobs to which you have applied and the current status of each.  Jobs which are currently posted are still available for application.
                        

                                                





How do I know my application was received?
                                                    




                                                    Each time you successfully apply to a job online with Jacobs, you will receive an e-mail acknowledging receipt of your application at the e-mail address you provided when creating your profile. If you do not receive such an e-mail within a few minutes at the e-mail address with which you registered, look in your junk mail folder or spam filter.

                                                





I am a former employee of Jacobs. How do I apply?
                                                    




Jacobs has transitioned to a new recruiting system. You may need to create a new profile and login to apply to jobs if you applied to Jacobs prior to June - November 2015.
If you have applied to jobs after that time, but have forgotten your login information, please visit Jacobs – Apply for a Job, and at the sign in page, click Forgot your user name? or Forgot your password? as appropriate.






I am a current employee at Jacobs. How do I apply for jobs?
                                                    




                                                    As an employee, you should visit the Talent Acquisition space on JacobsConnect to search and apply to available jobs.
         
                                                





How do I add a resume/CV or other documents to my profile after I have applied?
                                                    




                                                    Visit Jacobs – Apply for a Job, click Sign In on upper right-side of page.  After accepting the Privacy Agreement and signing in, click on your name on the upper right-side of the page where Sign In used to be.  Select Profile from the menu that appears.  Advance through the process by clicking Save and Continue until you reach the File Attachments step.  Follow the directions on this page to upload any attachments including your resume/CV.  Click Save and Continue to advance to the final step of process, and finally click Submit to complete the process.
                        
                                                





Expand/collapse arrowI have a received an offer from Jacobs but not sure if it is legitimate. How can I be sure?
                                                    




It has come to our attention that various individuals and/or organizations are contacting people offering false employment opportunities with Jacobs. These individuals and/or organizations may request personal information or money in order to progress the application.  Jacobs does not ask for money transfers or payments from applicants to secure a job. If you are asked for money transfers or payments to secure a job, you should assume that such individuals and/or organizations are not affiliated with Jacobs and have no authority to act on our behalf and are not providing genuine opportunities or offers.
All legitimate open jobs at Jacobs can be found through Jacobs – Apply for a Job.  Please consult at Jacobs – Apply for a Job to verify the legitimacy of a job opportunity.






I have a disability that prevents me from applying online. How do I express an interest for a specific job?
                                                    




Jacobs provides reasonable accommodation so that qualified disabled applicants may participate in the selection process. Please advise Jacobs of any accommodations you require in order to express an interest in a specific opening by emailing reasonable.accommodations@jacobs.com or calling +1 817.735.2869.
Please state your reasonable accommodation request for assistance in your message. Only reasonable accommodation requests related to applying for a specific position within Jacobs will be reviewed at the e-mail address and phone number supplied.





Other questions? Contact Us.













                    Stay Connected:
                        








NOTE: We do weekly scheduled maintenance on Fridays 4-5pm Pacific Time. Our apologies for the inconvenience.
                    









                                Notices:
                            

Recruitment fraud notice


Equal opportunity employment statement


Accessibility


California “Shine-the-Light” Law
















Recruitment fraud notice
It has come to our attention that various individuals and organizations are contacting people offering false employment opportunities with Jacobs. These individuals and organizations may request personal information or money in order to progress the application. Jacobs does not ask for money transfers or payments from applicants to secure a job. If you are asked for money transfers or payments to secure a job, you should assume that such individuals and organizations are not providing genuine offers or services. If you believe you have received a fraudulent job offer, we would appreciate you contacting us using our Contact us form.
All legitimate open positions at Jacobs can be found in our careers job site. Please access that from the Apply for a job section to verify the legitimacy of a job offer.










Equal opportunity employment statement

                                    Jacobs is an Equal Opportunity Employer and employment selection decisions are based on merit, qualifications, and abilities. Jacobs does not discriminate in employment opportunities or practices on the basis of: race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, sexual orientation, gender identity, disability, veteran status or any other characteristic protected by country, regional or local law.



                                    To view
the U.S. Department of Labor’s (DOL) Equal Employment Opportunity (EEO) is the
Law poster and supplement, please click the following links: EEO is
the Law, "EEO
is the Law" Poster Supplement<
                                


                                    Note to Virginia Job Seekers:  Jacobs ensures nondiscrimination and equal employment opportunity in all programs and activities in accordance with Title VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964. If you need more information or special assistance for persons with disabilities or limited English proficiency, contact the Human Resources Director at our Arlington, VA office at 571-218-1000. Persons with hearing-and speech-impairments can contact Jacobs by using the Virginia Relay Service, a toll-free telecommunication device for the deaf (TDD). Call 711 for TTY/TDD.
                                










Accessibility

                                    Jacobs provides reasonable accommodation so that qualified disabled applicants may participate in the selection process. Please advise Jacobs of any accommodations you require in order to express an interest in a specific opening by emailing: reasonable.accommodations@jacobs.com or calling +1 817.735.2869. Please state your reasonable accommodation request for assistance in your message. Only reasonable accommodation requests related to applying for a specific position within Jacobs will be reviewed at the e-mail address and phone number supplied. Thank you for considering Jacobs for your next career opportunity.
                                










California “Shine-the-Light” Law
Annually, California residents may request and obtain information that Jacobs shared with other businesses for their own direct marketing use within the prior calendar year (as defined by California’s “Shine the Light Law”).  As Jacobs does not share personal information with third parties for their direct marketing efforts, this law does not apply to personal information collected on this website.













 



Events
                








We want to meet you.





While technology allows us to connect with potential employees quickly and easily, when the opportunity exists, we still believe the best way to begin a relationship is face-to-face. Therefore, Jacobs participates in a variety of recruiting events so we can connect with you in person.





There are currently no upcoming events.










                                Event type 


Military
Craft
University
Staff




                                Location/University 


Leeds
Kansas City









Wednesday, March 22, 2017, 5-7:30pm
UK Recruitment Open Evening
Jacobs, 1 City Walk, Leeds LS11 9DX


Learn more











Thursday, March 30, 2017, 11am-5pm and Friday, March 31, 2017, 11am-5pm
National Society of Black Engineers (NSBE) Annual Convention
Kansas City, MO


Learn more























Join us








Return to top




Contact us
File transfer
Company store
Privacy & terms
© 2017 Jacobs. All rights reserved.









	About | Jacobs




































































 



About Jacobs
                








It’s about trusted relationships.






                        At Jacobs, our focus on building long-term client relationships has helped us become one of the largest and most diverse providers of technical, professional and construction services, including all aspects of architecture, engineering and construction, operations and maintenance, as well as scientific and specialty consulting. Our 54,000 employees in  230+ locations around the world serve a broad range of companies and organizations, including industrial, commercial, and government clients across multiple markets and geographies. 
                    

                        More than 95 percent of our work is repeat business. We get to know our customers’ businesses intimately, and partner with them to help them achieve their objectives. That commitment to our clients produces consistent cost advantages, profits and growth, allowing us to attract and retain the industry's top talent. Our strict dedication to safety and uncompromising ethics create a work environment that promotes employee progress and helps generate nearly $11 billion in annual revenue. 
                    

                        We measure the value we bring to clients every day — wherever in the world they may be, in any industry or technical discipline. In fact in 2016 we produced $7.79 billion in client savings through our JacobsValue program, a major accomplishment.
                    






See also:

Featured job openings
Employee career stories
What we are doing for our clients
Our project gallery
Our global locations  
Our company fact sheet
Our summary annual report









 



Vision, Mission and Values
                








Our vision, mission and values guide us in everything we do.






                        Our company’s Vision, Mission and Values are the cornerstones of our culture. They guide our global strategy, define our overarching goals, and serve as a constant reminder of Jacobs’ high performing, innovative and empowered culture.
                    
Our Vision, Mission and Values are inspired by our teammates, our rich history, and our promising future. For 70 years, Jacobs has been the driving force behind some of world’s greatest engineering feats.

                        These guiding principles help ensure that our company will continue to provide solutions for a more connected, sustainable world for many years to come. 
                    

Featured job openings
Employee career stories
What we are doing for our clients
Our project gallery
Our global locations  
Our company fact sheet  
Our summary annual report











See also:









 



Safety








Take safety everywhere you go.






                        For Jacobs, safety is more than a policy manual or a training video; it’s how we do business and it’s how we live 24/7. Jacobs invites you to experience our culture of caring – a culture in which safety, health and welfare are top priorities; and in which we’re all responsible for looking out for one another.
                    

                        Jacobs' safety culture extends outside the office walls, beyond the project site and into our cars, our homes, and our communities; affecting all the people we interact with everywhere around the world. BeyondZero® is the name of our safety program, and it’s about every one of us making safety a personal value that we live by each day.
                    






Learn more about:

Our philosophy on making safety happen   
Video: view our support of Wireless Industry Safety Task Force’s Tie-off 24/7 Campaign










Safety Week 2017
Kate's Story: A safety video
BeyondZero: Home. Work. You.











Being safe every day on every job site crosses competitive boundaries. Jacobs is proud to sponsor Safety Week, an initiative of more than 40 national and global construction firms that have joined forces with a single aim: to inspire everyone in the industry to be leaders in safety. 
During Safety Week, May 1-5, 2017, Jacobs employees worldwide will kick off our celebration of the 10th anniversary of our BeyondZero® culture of caring. We’ll hold workshops, contests, and even dance performances. Offices and jobsites will learn about our daily topics:

BeyondZero’s 10th Anniversary
Make Safety a Constant
Positive Mental Health
Emergency Preparedness
Local Choice

We hope that whether you’re an employee or prospective employee, a client, subcontractor, competitor, or just an interested member of the public, you’ll join us in participating in Safety Week.

Learn more about our industry’s Safety Week and get ideas for your own Safety Week event.
Join the global safety conversation on LinkedIn.
Post a photo on Jacobs’ Safety Selfies area -- share your safety passion at work and at home.

Thank you for helping to celebrate safety!



“Kate’s Story” tells the tragic story of Jacobs employee Kate Carpenter (London, UK), whose husband, John Kinns, also an employee, lost his life as the result of injuries sustained in the field.
Produced internally by Jacobs, the video has been shown and discussed at office meetings around the globe and has had a profound impact within the company. The video is now available for employees to view and share with family, friends, business partners, and clients.
Please take Kate’s message to heart.


 ®
BeyondZero© is Jacobs' safety program.We provide a variety of useful safety tools and training to all Jacobs employees, covering topics that are applicable at work, at home, and everywhere they go. Jacobs is always working to identify critical risks that cause injuries, illnesses, and incidents. Then we take proactive steps to eliminate them by helping our people develop safer behaviors, and by encouraging them to inspire others to do the same.










 



Ethics and integrity
                








Ethics and integrity are our foundation.





Over decades of consistent behavior guided by our core values, Jacobs has earned a reputation as an ethical company. We make decisions with fairness and honesty, holding ourselves and our colleagues accountable for high standards of conduct on each job we do throughout the world.
Our Board of Directors, CEO, and Senior Financial Officers take ethics and integrity very seriously. Our company is built upon a deep commitment to ethical behavior and as such our leadership at the highest levels are governed by a code of conduct.  Our Code of Business Conduct and Ethics for Jacobs Board of Directors and our Code of Ethics for the Chief Executive Officer and Senior Financial Officers demonstrates our pledge to run our company with integrity.
Jacobs' Code of Conduct is a useful guide for all our employees worldwide that outlines our collective commitment to our values and beliefs, and helps us exercise ethical decision making and good judgment – even in difficult situations.
Jacobs also expects the companies we partner with to operate with a high level of integrity, and our corresponding Supplier Code of Conduct is applicable to those in our supply chain. We also encourage our employees and suppliers to ask questions when in doubt and report violations, which they can do via an email address or our Integrity Hotline (1.877.522.6272). 
Most recently and for the second time since 2010, Jacobs has been named one of America’s Most Trustworthy Companies by Forbes Magazine. In the large-cap category, Jacobs is one of only 14 firms featured and the only engineering and construction company featured in the large cap category. Read more on Forbes.







                        “Every day we strive to act with integrity and honesty to ensure the health and future of our company. We ask that each of our Jacobs teammates, clients and partners commit to maintaining the highest ethical standards.” — Steve Demetriou, Chairman and CEO
                    

See also:

Call our Integrity Hotline: 1.877.522.6272
                            
Email us to report a violation or ask a question
                            
See Our Employee Code of Conduct
                                 
View Our Code of Business Conduct and Ethics for Jacobs Board of Directors
                                 
Read Our Code of Ethics for the CEO and Senior Financial Officers
See Our Supplier Code of Conduct
                                 
UK Modern Slavery Statement
                                 









 



Inclusion
                








Inclusion means welcoming all backgrounds, experiences and ideas.





At Jacobs, we value inclusion and diversity because it energizes our people and encourages creativity, collaboration, and innovation. Learning about new and different perspectives and experiences creates more varied thinking. Considering several unique points of view often results in better decisions and solutions for our clients, our investors, and ultimately our company.
The term “inclusive” can refer to many things; but as it applies to Jacobs, it means welcoming and respecting the varied backgrounds, talents, skills, and experiences of all our employees and everyone we do business with around the world – embracing and appreciating both our similarities and our differences. Inclusion is woven throughout our culture of caring; enabling us to be an engaged, committed, and productive company that produces positive results for our clients and their stakeholders. Come work for us - we want you on our team!






See also:

Our various career paths
Our latest hot jobs!
Our markets
Our clients stories
Our global locations 
Our supplier diversity program









 



Sustainability
                








Sustainable projects create enduring legacies.





Our clients want to find the best sustainable solutions for their projects around the world. We help them do just that. Jacobs is dedicated to the advancement of safe and sustainable services for our clients and within our own company. Our core values guide our commitment to an ethical, relationship-based, and cost-conscious business — a sustainable business.
Around the world, across all disciplines, Jacobs works to constantly demonstrate our commitment to sustainability through our words and actions. That commitment is reflected every day through our low-cost posture, our BeyondZero® safety philosophy, and our adherence to our Seven Principles of Sustainability.
We are continually improving and reinvigorating our efforts to be responsible stewards of the natural world as we contribute timely and efficient services and effective, tailored sustainable solutions for our clients. This is the best way we can save them money and help make their businesses successful. The work we do supports them in achieving their project goals – and in creating an enduring legacy.






See also:

View the  2016 Jacobs Sustainability Report (PDF)  
View all our past reports and apps  
Read about our seven principles of sustainability








Rush University Medical Center, Rush Transformation Program, Chicago, IL, USA


United States Air Force Reserve Command, 310th Space Wing Headquarters, Schriever Air Force Base, Colorado Springs, CO, USA


Dallas Fort Worth International Airport, DFW Airport Terminal A Phase I, DFW Airport, TX, USA


Swinburne University, Advanced Manufacturing Design Centre, Melbourne, Victoria, Australia


Fife Council, Burntisland Primary School, Burntisland, Fife, Scotland, UK


Mission Solar Energy, Solar Panel Production Plant, San Antonio, TX, USA


Campbell Soup Company, Campbell Employee Center, Camden, NJ, USA


General Services Administration, Armed Forces Retirement Home, Gulfport, MS, USA


North Carolina State University, Cates Cogeneration Plant, Raleigh, NC, USA









 



Global network
                








We’re global. And we’re local.





Our delivery philosophy is simple: Jacobs is located around the world where our clients are today and where they need us to be tomorrow. Their needs help drive our business, so we expand our offerings, locations, and staff to best serve them when and where they need us.
The result is a global network of local offices that share common values and a commitment to customized service. Jacobs employees from our 230+ locations communicate seamlessly across geographic and disciplinary areas on a daily basis to collaborate, share innovative ideas and best practices, and help clients find the best solutions for every project. We do this through regular use of our internal social communication tools and through a variety of facilitated networking events and functions that create a boundaryless, supportive and productive atmosphere within the company.
With nearly 54,000 talented, dedicated employees, Jacobs' diverse and international workforce gives clients an established local presence that understands their businesses, helping to reduce risk and maximize value. Because everyone at Jacobs is guided by the same core values and operates according to the same Code of Conduct, we behave and perform consistently no matter where we are; one company around the globe.






Learn more about:

Our locations
Our inclusion philosophy
Our history
Client features 

































 



Our history
                








Our rich history fuels the future.





Our history begins with the company's founding by Joseph J. Jacobs in 1947. Since then, we have gradually evolved from a one-man engineering consultant to the publicly traded Fortune 500 company we are today. 
About two-thirds of Jacobs' consistent growth comes from organic expansion as we serve the changing and growing needs of our customers. Because we partner with our clients and truly understand their business objectives, we work in the locations and industries where they need us to be; and we position ourselves to serve their needs effectively.
Another way Jacobs is able to continuously improve and grow is through acquisition. We have acquired more than 70 businesses, and each one has contributed to our reach and capabilities. Together, as Jacobs, we deliver the benefits of a fully integrated global organization.
Our rich history guides our growth, and the possibilities are limitless in terms of the company we are yet to become. But a few simple things remain constant throughout times of change: our firm commitment to our relationship based business model; and our focus on safety, quality, and ethics are foundational to who we are.






Evolution of a Company:



1947
Founded by Joseph J. Jacobs in Pasadena, California


1967
Opened our first satellite office in New Jersey


1970
Stock listed on the American Stock Exchange


1989
Stock moved to New York Stock Exchange


1989
Passed the $1 billion mark in annual revenues


1997
Exceeds 15,000 employees


1999
Fortune Magazine names us “Most Admired E&C Company.”


2007
Declared two-for-one stock split


2013
Reached 70,000 employees


2015
Appointed Steven J. Demetriou as President and CEO


2016
Moved corporate headquarters to Dallas, Texas


2016
Announced first stock dividend program









Jim, Al, Tony looking at drawings (undisclosed project)


Dr. Jacobs at Potassium Nitrate plant in Vicksburg, MS, USA


The opening of our headquarters on 251 S. Lake.


Dr. Jacobs at Potassium Nitrate plant in Vicksburg, MS, USA


Dr. Jacobs at Potassium Nitrate plant in Vicksburg, MS, USA


Dedication of the Jacobs Science Center at Harvey Mudd College (Claremont, CA, USA - 1980)


Groundbreaking event for a new underground parking facility.


Dr. Jacobs meets King Hussein of Jordan at Dead Sea plant dedication - 1982








 



Suppliers and partners
                








Exceptional suppliers boost our strength.





A key component of our approach to providing superior value to our clients is to augment Jacobs staff with quality suppliers, vendors and partners. Our global organization of suppliers provides us with additional strengths that enable us to meet and exceed our clients' goals and objectives.
As such, Jacobs is always looking for new, diverse, and innovative partners to enhance our project teams and strengthen our capabilities for clients’ projects. We search for suppliers in every part of our business, in all our industries and service offerings around the globe. Jacobs is committed to supplier diversity across the world and support other organizations that also promote business diversity and inclusion.
Another key component to our success is our commitment to conducting business ethically, safely, and fairly – and we expect our business partners to do the same. This means following the laws of the countries where we operate, specifically as it relates to anti-corruption compliance, fair business practices, labor conditions, and human rights. Jacobs expects our partners to follow our Supplier Code of Conduct when dealing with us, our clients, and the projects they work on. 
Come Work with Us
Regardless of your business size, type, or services, all potential suppliers and vendors must register with us through our Central Supplier Database to be eligible for teaming and contract opportunities. Registering allows our client relationship managers and staff, to be aware of your capabilities and value. Register with us today!
Already a registered supplier? Update your information with us here.






Learn more about:

Our supplier code of conduct
Jacobs code of conduct
Help using our supplier database [PDF]
Help using our supplier database [Video]
Our U.S. supplier diversity program 
Qualifying for U.S. federal projects 



Integrity and ethics 
Safety
Inclusion and diversity 
Procurement services
Project gallery


Contact us to learn more about how we can work together.












Contact us
                










Need to know more? Please contact us.

Do you have a question or a comment? Need more information or help with something? Please contact us. For information about current job postings, please visit Apply for a job. Resumes or employment inquiries sent via this page will not be considered.
Recruitment fraud notice: It has come to our attention that various individuals and organizations are contacting people offering false employment opportunities with Jacobs. These individuals and organizations may request personal information or money in order to progress the application. Jacobs does not ask for money transfers or payments from applicants to secure a job. All legitimate open positions at Jacobs can be searched for and verified via our careers job site.

Thank you for contacting Jacobs. Your comments have been sent.



E-mail address:
* Please enter a valid e-Mail address.


Topics
* Please choose a topic.


Careers/Employees


Apply for a job technical issues See answers to common questions about applying for a job.



Internship inquiryLearn more about our internship opportunities or Apply for a Job and enter “intern” in the Keyword box.



Former employee supportI am a former Jacobs employee and need assistance with employment verification, retirement/401k, address change, tax documents, etc.



Report ethics/integrity issue



Clients, Suppliers & Partners


Sales inquiry/bid opportunity



Become a supplier/vendorRegister with us to become a supplier, vendor, or partner.



Supplier database issue



Others


Investor relations



Sponsorships/community involvement/corporate givingFor information about Jacobs’ recent charitable and political contributions, and for general community involvement questions, please email us at CorporateGiving@jacobs.com.



Website issue/feedback



General comment/other





Comment/Question: (Please include your name and company name)
* A comment is required.




Help us reduce spam!

* Please verify that you're not a robot.



Submit




















About








Return to top




Contact us
File transfer
Company store
Privacy & terms
© 2017 Jacobs. All rights reserved.










	Jacobs - Investors






































































Company profile


Merck Vaccine bulk manufacturing facility 

Engineering, procurement, construction management, and commissioning/validation services, as well as full modular design and fabrication
Durham, North Carolina, USA





With 2016 revenues of nearly $11 billion, Jacobs is one of the world’s largest and most diverse providers of technical, professional, and construction services.













Investors

Company profile

Stock information
Filings and reports
Webcasts and presentations
Corporate governance













We grow our business by helping our clients grow theirs. By putting their needs first, we build long-term 
relationships with industrial, commercial 
and government clients in multiple markets. In fact, 
more than 90 percent of our work is repeat
business.

That commitment to client value and partnership produces consistent cost advantages, profits and growth for Jacobs, allowing us to attract and retain the industry’s top talent.
Today, nearly 54,000 employees help us prosper in diverse industries by holding true to our values and culture. Headquartered in Dallas, Texas, USA, our global network spans more than 230+ offices in countries across North America, South America, Europe, the Middle East, India, Australia, Africa, and Asia.
Please contact shareholder.information@jacobs.com to receive additional investor materials. More information about Jacobs is also available in our SEC filings.











Latest News and Press Releases





See more press releases





Historical Price Look UpInvestor calculator



Forward-Looking Statement Disclaimer Applies


Statements made on this website, including in any documents or materials posted to this website, that are not based on historical fact are forward-looking statements. We base these forward-looking statements on management’s current estimates and expectations as well as currently available competitive, financial and economic data. Forward-looking statements, however, are inherently uncertain. There are a variety of factors that could cause business results to differ materially from our forward-looking statements.


For a description of some of the factors which may occur that could cause actual results to differ from our forward-looking statements please refer to our latest Form 10-K, and in particular the discussions contained under Items 1 - Business, 1A - Risk Factors, 3 - Legal Proceedings, and 7 - Management's Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations, as well as our other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission.  We also caution readers that we do not undertake to update any forward-looking statements made on this website.


Latest

Featured events 




Aug 8, 2017 at 10:00 AM ET
Q3 2017 Jacobs Earnings Conference Call


Listen to the live webcast

View the Press Release?()







See more events





Stock quote

Stock Quote: NYSE


Jacobs Engineering Group Inc. NYSE: JEC


$
52.30

on Jul 21, 2017 at 4:02  P.M.  




Change:
-0.24
(-0.46%)


Volume:
571,076








Stay in touch

Sign up for email alerts whenever Jacobs posts new investor information.

Email Address


*








Mailing Lists
*






Press releases

SEC filings

Presentations

Events

Financial reports













 





Enter the code shown above.



*








or email us at investor.relations@jacobs.com





Transfer agent


Correspondence about share ownership, transfer requirements, changes of address, lost stock certificates, and account status may be directed to:
Wells Fargo Shareowner Services
161 North Concord Exchange Street
South St. Paul, Minnesota 55075-1139
+ 1.800.468.9716 voice
+ 1.651.450.4064 voice
+ 1.651.450.4033 fax
http://www.wellsfargo.com/shareownerservices






















Stock information


Stock information



Stock quote

Stock Quote: NYSE

NYSE:JEC



$
52.30

Jul 21, 2017 4:02  P.M.  



Change
-0.24
(-0.46%)


Volume
571,076




Today’s open
52.44


Previous close
52.54




Intraday high
52.54


Intraday low
51.96




52 Week high
63.42


52 Week low
49.15



Pricing delayed 20 minutes













Historical Price Lookup

Lookup Date

Jan
Feb
Mar
Apr
May
Jun
Jul
Aug
Sep
Oct
Nov
Dec


1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31







High



Low



Opening Price



Previous Close



Volume

















Filings and reports







Filings and reports
Download our SEC filings and reports, as well as our summary annual reports.



SECfilings
Annual Reports (10K) & Proxy Statements
Summaryannual reports
Sustainability reports







< Previous

Next >







< Previous

Next >












Date
Download
Description


2016
Sustainability Report

9.61 MB




2015
Sustainability Report


10.20 MB




2014
Sustainability Report


20.62 MB




2013
Sustainability Report


3.08 MB




2012
Sustainability Report

3.25 MB




2011
Sustainability Report

3.66 MB




2010
Sustainability Report 

5.73 MB




2009
Sustainability Report

3.25 MB
























Webcasts and presentations

Feature Presentation - Lorem Ipsum est  

Engineering, procurement, construction management, and commissioning/validation services, as well as full modular design and fabrication
Durham, North Carolina, USA




Webcasts and presentations



EventTypeDocumentsDate
















Forward-Looking Statement Disclaimer Applies


Statements made on this website, including in any documents or materials posted to this website, that are not based on historical fact are forward-looking statements. We base these forward-looking statements on management’s current estimates and expectations as well as currently available competitive, financial and economic data. Forward-looking statements, however, are inherently uncertain. There are a variety of factors that could cause business results to differ materially from our forward-looking statements.


For a description of some of the factors which may occur that could cause actual results to differ from our forward-looking statements please refer to our latest Form 10-K, and in particular the discussions contained under Items 1 - Business, 1A - Risk Factors, 3 - Legal Proceedings, and 7 - Management's Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations, as well as our other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission.  We also caution readers that we do not undertake to update any forward-looking statements made on this website.



Corporate governance







Corporate Governance
This section includes information on how we operate our company in alignment with the best interests of our shareholders and in compliance with all legal and regulatory requirements. You can also learn about our Board members and their roles in guiding our company as well as a means of contacting them.


Meet our board
Board committees
& charters
Contact our
board
Corporate governance
documents




Audit Committee
Purpose:
Chaired by Joseph R. Bronson, the Audit Committee assists our Board in overseeing the integrity of our financial statements, verifying our compliance with legal and regulatory requirements, and supervising the performance of our internal audit function.
Audit Committee Charter 









Joseph R. Bronson 
            (Chair)
Christopher M.T. 
            Thompson
Dawne S.
            Hickton
Robert A. McNamara





Contact Our Audit Committee 
Nominating and Corporate Governance Committee
Purpose:
Chaired by Robert C. Davidson, Jr., the Nominating and Corporate Governance Committee assists our Board in identifying and recommending qualified individuals to become directors, and in developing and implementing our Company's corporate governance guidelines.
Nominating and Corporate Governance Committee Charter 










Robert C.
            Davidson, Jr. (Chair)
Juan José Suárez
            Coppel
Dawne S.
            Hickton
Ralph E. Eberhart





Human Resource and Compensation Committee
Purpose:
Chaired by Peter J. Robertson, the Human Resource and Compensation Committee approves all of the policies that determine executive compensation and assists our Board in evaluating and developing candidates for executive positions.

Human Resource and Compensation Committee Charter 










Peter J. 
            Robertson
            (Chair)
Ralph E. Eberhart


Juan José Suárez
            Coppel
Chris
           Thompson



 



Contact Our Board
Shareholders, employees and interested parties who wish to communicate with our Company's independent directors may do so by either:

Calling confidentially or anonymously to our Company's Integrity Hotline, +1.877.522.6272;
Writing directly, confidentially or anonymously using an envelope marked confidential to:
Lead Independent Director
c/o Corporate Secretary
Jacobs Engineering Group Inc.
600 Wilshire Boulevard, Suite 1000,
Los Angeles, CA 90017 or
Sending a confidential e-mail to leadindependent.director@jacobs.com
Contact Our Audit Committee
Shareholders, employees and interested parties may submit at any time a good faith complaint regarding any questionable accounting, internal accounting controls, or auditing matters concerning our Company without fear of dismissal or retaliation of any kind. We encourage employees to report their concerns and complaints to our Company's senior management; to the Vice President, Internal Audit; or to the Audit Committee of the Board of Directors. Shareholders, employees and interested parties who wish to communicate with our Audit Committee may do so by either:

Calling confidentially or anonymously to our Company's Integrity Hotline, +1.877.522.6272;
Writing directly, confidentially or anonymously using an envelope marked confidential to:
Chair, Audit Committee
c/o Corporate Secretary
Jacobs Engineering Group Inc.
600 Wilshire Boulevard, Suite 1000,
Los Angeles, CA 90017
 or
Sending a confidential e-mail to audit.committee@jacobs.com.






Purpose:
Chaired by Joseph R. Bronson, the Audit Committee assists our Board in overseeing the integrity of our financial statements, verifying our compliance with legal and regulatory requirements, and supervising the performance of our internal audit function.
Audit Committee Charter
Members:
Joseph R. Bronson (Chair)
Peter J. Robertson
Christopher M.T. Thompson 

Contact Our Audit Committee


Purpose:
Chaired by Linda Fayne Levinson, the Human Resource and Compensation Committee approves all of the policies that determine executive compensation and assists our Board in evaluating and developing candidates for executive positions.
Human Resource and Compensation Committee Charter
Members:
Linda Fayne Levinson (Chair)
Ralph E. Eberhart
John F. Coyne


Purpose:
Chaired by Edward Fritzky, the Nominating and Corporate Governance Committee assists our Board in identifying and recommending qualified individuals to become directors, and in developing and implementing our Company's corporate governance guidelines.
Nominating and Corporate Governance Committee Charter 
Members:
Edward V. Fritzky (Chair)
Robert C. Davidson, Jr.
Juan José Suárez Coppel


Shareholders, employees and interested parties who wish to communicate with our Company's independent directors may do so by either:

Calling confidentially or anonymously to our Company's Integrity Hotline, 1.877.522.6272;
Writing directly, confidentially or anonymously using an envelope marked confidential to:
    Presiding Director
    c/o Corporate Secretary
    Jacobs Engineering Group Inc.
    155 North Lake Avenue 91101
    P.O. Box 7084
    Pasadena, California, U.S.A., 91109-7084; or
Sending a confidential e-mail to presiding.director@jacobs.com.

Contact Our Audit Committee
Shareholders, employees and interested parties may submit at any time a good faith complaint regarding any questionable accounting, internal accounting controls, or auditing matters concerning our Company without fear of dismissal or retaliation of any kind. We encourage employees to report their concerns and complaints to our Company's senior management; to the Vice President, Internal Audit; or to the Audit Committee of the Board of Directors. Shareholders, employees and interested parties who wish to communicate with our Audit Committee may do so by either:

Calling confidentially or anonymously to our Company's Integrity Hotline, 1.877.522.6272;
Writing directly, confidentially or anonymously using an envelope marked confidential to:
    Chair, Audit Committee
    c/o Corporate Secretary
    Jacobs Engineering Group Inc.
    155 North Lake Avenue 91101
    P.O. Box 7084
    Pasadena, California, U.S.A., 91109-7084; or
Sending a confidential e-mail to audit.committee@jacobs.com.












Download
Description


Jacobs Code of Conduct

7.00 MB




Certificate of Incorporation

328 KB




Corporate Bylaws

227 KB




Code of Business Conduct and Ethics for Board of Directors
As amended and restated on March 27, 2014 to reflect certain technical and ministerial changes.
30 KB




Code of Ethics for the Chief Executive Officer and Senior Financial Officers  
As amended and restated on March 27, 2014 to reflect certain technical and ministerial changes.
29 KB




Board of Directors Guidelines for Determining the Independence of its Members 

87 KB




Corporate Governance Guidelines

35 KB





















Forward-Looking Statement Disclaimer Applies


Statements made on this website, including in any documents or materials posted to this website, that are not based on historical fact are forward-looking statements. We base these forward-looking statements on management’s current estimates and expectations as well as currently available competitive, financial and economic data. Forward-looking statements, however, are inherently uncertain. There are a variety of factors that could cause business results to differ materially from our forward-looking statements.


For a description of some of the factors which may occur that could cause actual results to differ from our forward-looking statements please refer to our latest Form 10-K, and in particular the discussions contained under Items 1 - Business, 1A - Risk Factors, 3 - Legal Proceedings, and 7 - Management's Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations, as well as our other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission.  We also caution readers that we do not undertake to update any forward-looking statements made on this website.









Powered By Q4 Inc. 4.5.0.5


        © 2017 Jacobs. All rights reserved.
    



Contact us
|
File transfer
|
Company store
|
Privacy & terms 




Return to top




Statements that are not based on historical fact are forward-looking statements.   Although such statements are based on management’s current estimates and expectations, and currently available competitive, financial, and economic data, forward-looking statements are inherently uncertain.  We, therefore, caution the reader that there are a variety of factors that could cause business conditions and results to differ materially from what is contained in our forward-looking statements.


For a description of some of the factors which may occur that could cause actual results to differ from our forward-looking statements please refer to our 2009 Form 10-K, and in particular the discussions contained under Items 1 - Business, 1A - Risk Factors, 3 - Legal Proceedings, and 7 - Management's Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations. We caution readers that we do not undertake to update any forward-looking.









Steven J. Demetriou
,

, Director since 2015
,

, Chairman of the Board and CEO




Mr. Demetriou joined Jacobs as President and Chief Executive Officer in August 2015, and became Chairman of the Board in July 2016. He offers international business perspectives and more than 30 years in leadership and senior management roles to build on Jacobs' strong foundations, including 14 years in the role as Chief Executive Officer. Most recently, he served as Chairman and Chief Executive Officer of Aleris Corporation, a global downstream aluminum producer. Over the course of his career, Steve has gained broad experience with companies in a wide range of industries, including Metals, Specialty Chemicals, Oil & Gas, Manufacturing and Fertilizers. His career highlights include 16 years at ExxonMobil.
Steve is a member of Jacobs’ Board of Directors and also serves on the board of Kraton Performance Polymers. He served on the board of Foster-Wheeler for several years and was Non-Executive Chairman of Foster-Wheeler from 2011-2014.








Linda Fayne Levinson
,

, Director since 1996
,

, Lead DirectorIndependent




Ms. Fayne Levinson is an experienced executive and corporate director. From 1997 until 2004, she was a Partner of GRP Partners, a venture capital firm that invests in early stage technology companies. Prior to that, she was an executive at Creative Artists Agency, Inc.; a Partner at Wings Partners, a Los Angeles based private equity firm; President of Fayne Levinson Associates, an independent consulting firm; a Senior Vice President of American Express Travel Related Services Co., Inc.; and a Partner of McKinsey & Company, where she became the first woman partner in 1979.Ms. Fayne Levinson also serves as a member of the Boards of Hertz, Ingram Micro, Inc., NCR Corporation and The Western Union Company. Ms. Levinson’s experience brings in-depth knowledge of business operations, strategy, compensation strategies and other corporate governance matters to the Board of Directors.








Joseph R. Bronson
,

, Director since 2003
,

, Independent




Mr. Bronson is Principal and CEO of The Bronson Group, LLC, a consulting firm primarily engaged in the area of financial and operational consulting. In March 2014, he started serving as Strategic Advisor to Cowen and Company, a New York-based investment bank. In May 2011, he was appointed an Advisory Director to GCA/Savvian, LLC, a financial advisory firm based in San Francisco, California. Prior to that, he held top executive positions at a number of product development and manufacturing firms in the electronics and technology industries; including Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer of Applied Materials, Inc., the global leader in semiconductor capital equipment. Mr. Bronson had a number of general management and executive positions with Applied Materials spanning 22 years.
Mr. Bronson also currently serves on the Boards of Directors of Maxim Integrated Products, Inc., a leading supplier of analog devices to semiconductor industry, and PDF Solutions, Inc., a company involved in the semiconductor diagnostic business. He is a Certified Public Accountant and a member of the American Institute of CPAs and serves as Trustee of Fairfield University and is Chairman of the Leavey School of Business Advisory Board, Santa Clara University, California. He is also a director of two private companies.
Mr. Bronson brings accounting expertise and familiarity with financial statements, financial disclosures, auditing and internal controls to the Board from his prior service as Chief Financial Officer. His senior management level experience at large publicly traded companies also brings to the Board additional perspective regarding the day to day operations of large organizations as well as corporate best practices.









Juan José Suárez Coppel
,

, Director since 2013
,

, Independent




Mr. Suárez was General Director (Chief Executive Officer) of PEMEX, the national oil company of Mexico, from 2009 to 2012. Prior to his tenure as General Director, Mr. Suárez held other positions at PEMEX, including Chief Financial Officer from 2001 to 2006. He also served as Chief of Staff of Mexico’s Secretary of Finance and Public Credit in 2000 and 2001.In the private sector, Mr. Suárez was Co-Head of Equity Derivative Trading at Banamex from 1991 to 1995 and has held senior leadership positions at Grupo Televisa and Grupo Modelo; Mexico’s largest media company and largest brewer, respectively. Mr. Suárez also taught economics at several leading universities in Mexico, Europe and the United States.Mr. Suárez provides strong expertise in the oil and gas industry, which is particularly valuable given the Company’s customers in this industry. He also brings extensive knowledge and experience in finance matters and his experience as an executive brings perspective on management and operational matters to the Board. His background in international operations also assists the Board in matters of Jacobs’ growing international presence.








Robert C. Davidson, Jr.
,

, Director since 2001
,

, Independent




Mr. Davidson is retired. He served as the Chairman and Chief Executive Officer of Surface Protection Industries, Inc., a company that provided surface protection products and services worldwide from 1978 to October 2007.
He serves as a member of the Boards of Morehouse College (Chairman), Art Center College of Design (Chairman), Cedars-Sinai Medical Center (Vice Chair of Audit Committee), Broadway Federal Bank, f.s.b. (Chairman of Compensation Committee and Internal Asset Review Committee), and the University of Chicago Graduate School of Business Advisory Council. He received a Bachelor of Arts degree from Morehouse College and an MBA in Marketing and Finance from the University of Chicago.
Mr. Davidson brings strong leadership and knowledge and experience of strategic and financial matters to the Board from his experience founding and building private companies, his almost 30-year career at Surface Protection Industries, Inc., and his prior service as a chief executive officer and chairman. He also brings to the Board important knowledge of public company governance through his service on multiple public company boards, including service on compensation committees.








Ralph Edward ("Ed") Eberhart
,

, Director since 2012
,

, Independent




General Eberhart currently serves as Chairman and President of the Armed Forces Benefit Association, a 400,000 member organization. He is a former General Officer of the United States Air Force. A graduate of the United States Air Force Academy, General Eberhart held numerous high-level command and staff positions within the Air Force over his 36-year career. He served as Commander of the North American Aerospace Defense Command (NORAD) on 9/11, and in the aftermath of 9/11, he was selected as the first Commander of the U.S. Northern Command. He also served as Commander of Air Combat Command and U.S. Space Command.He serves on the boards of Rockwell Collins, Triumph Group, Inc. and VSE Corporation. General Eberhart brings valuable leadership and management skills developed through his military service. His 36-year military career provides the Board with valuable experience and knowledge of government and the military, which is particularly valuable given Jacobs’ government and military contracts.








Dawne S. Hickton
,

, Director since 2015
,

, Independent 




Ms. Hickton is the former Vice Chair, President and Chief Executive Officer of RTI International Metals, Inc., a global supplier of advanced titanium products and services in commercial aerospace, defense, propulsion, medical device and energy markets. Her tenure with RTI spanned from 2007 to 2015.
In 2017, Ms. Hickton was appointed deputy chair of the board for the Federal Reserve Bank of Cleveland. She previously served as a director of the Federal Reserve Bank of Cleveland, Pittsburgh Branch, from 2013 to 2015, serving as chair of the branch board in 2014 and 2015.
In 2016, she joined the board of Norsk Titanium AS and is an officer and member of the Board of Directors of the International Titanium Association. She sits on the Boards of Directors of the Triumph Group and Smithsonian’s National Air and Space Museum and also serves on the board of The Wings Club.
In addition, Ms. Hickton is a member of the University of Pittsburgh’s Board of Trustees, serving on the Nominating, Student Affairs, and Property and Facilities Committees. Prior to her tenure at RTI, she served as a public company director of FNB Corporation from 2006 until 2013.
Ms. Hickton provides a wealth of proven business leadership experience with a CEOs perspective, and advanced strengths in project management and engineering expertise. Her background as a senior officer in a publicly traded company for nearly two decades is particularly valuable to the Board, as it lends a contemporary understanding of how to engage with the Company’s stakeholders, in addition to driving a strong growth agenda.








Robert A. McNamara
,

, Board Member since 2017
,

, Independent




Mr. McNamara is the Group Chief Risk Officer of the Lend Lease Corporation (ASX), an international property and infrastructure firm. Since 2014, he has been responsible for ensuring Lend Lease achieves world’s best practices in risk management and operational excellence. He also oversees Lend Lease’s Building, Engineering, and Services businesses in Australia. Prior to this, Mr. McNamara was Chief Executive Officer Americas of Lend Lease.
McNamara has over 35 years of experience managing global businesses in the development, design and delivery of projects in the government, institutional, infrastructure and industrial sectors in senior management positions. He served as Chairman and Chief Executive Officer of Penhall/LVI International (PLI), the two largest US firms providing environmental remediation, concrete services and infrastructure repair.
From 1996 to 2006, Mr. McNamara served as Senior Group President of Fluor Corporation responsible for the global businesses in Chemicals, Mining, Industrial, and Infrastructure, as well as its China initiative. From 1977 to 1996, he served as President and Chief Operating Officer of Marshall Contractors, where he led the firm’s initiatives in community development, pharmaceuticals and microelectronics design/build project delivery.
Mr. McNamara serves on the Board of UDR, Inc., a publicly traded Real Estate Investment Trust (REIT). He has also served on the Board of the US China Business Council and as Chairman for the Construction Industry Institute’s Technology Implementation Task Force. He brings deep international experience along with extensive industry and customer knowledge furthering Jacobs’ commitment to executing our company strategy.









Peter J. Robertson
,

, Director since 2009
,

, Independent




Mr. Robertson is retired. Mr. Robertson was Vice Chairman of the Board for Chevron Corporation, one of the world’s largest energy companies, until April 1, 2009. He joined Chevron in 1973 and over his 36 year career he had a wide variety of responsibilities including directing Chevron’s worldwide exploration and production and global gas businesses, corporate strategic planning, policy, government and public affairs. He was also Chief Financial Officer of Chevron USA.
He is a non-executive director of SASOL Limited and an advisory director of Campbell-Lutyens. He is co-chairman of the US Saudi Arabian Business Council and chairman of the World Affairs Council of Northern California. He is a past chairman of the US Energy Association. A native of Edinburgh, Scotland, he holds a Bachelor of Science degree in Mechanical Engineering from the University of Edinburgh and an MBA from the University of Pennsylvania, Wharton School, where he was a Thouron Scholar.
Mr. Robertson brings vital knowledge and experience to the Board in the oil and gas industry from his over 36-year career at Chevron Corporation, which is particularly important given the number of Company customers in the energy and refining sector. He also brings valuable international experience in developed and developing countries from his executive experience and the multiple chairmanship and director positions he has held and currently holds. Mr. Robertson also has accounting know-how and experience with public company financial statements, disclosures and accounting rules from his service as Chief Financial Officer of Chevron USA.









Christopher M.T. Thompson
,

, Director since 2012
,

, Independent




Mr. Thompson was Chairman and Chief Executive Officer of Gold Fields Ltd., an international gold producer with over 50,000 employees and operations on five continents from 1998 to 2002, and continued as Chairman of that company through 2005. He was also Chairman of the World Gold Council from 2002 to 2005.  He founded and was Chief Executive Officer of Castle Group Ltd., an international investment company that helped support the development of new mines. He served on the board of Teck Resources Limited from 2003 to 2015 and on the board of Golden Star Resources Ltd. from 2010 to 2015. He currently serves on the board of Royal Gold, Inc., a company that acquires and manages precious metal royalties and streams, as well as on the board of a privately-held biotechnology company based in the U.S. He is a member of the Board of Governors of the Colorado School of Mines.
Mr. Thompson has an extensive background in the mining industry, providing strong knowledge of and management and operational experience in this area to the Board, which is particularly valuable given the Company’s customers in this industry. He also provides knowledge of the biotechnology industry, which is also important given the Company’s customers in that industry. His senior management level experience also brings to the Board additional perspective regarding the day to day operations of large organizations as well as corporate best practices.

























	Client advocate | Jacobs




































































 



Client advocate
                








Looking out for our clients’ interests. Period.













Jacobs is a relationship-based company. This is one of our three core values, and it means that we partner with our clients to develop long-term relationships with them, get to know their businesses and objectives on a deep level, advocate for their interests as our own, and help them grow.
Our people consistently deliver for clients, which is why more than 90 percent of the work Jacobs does comes from repeat business through our long-term relationships. We customize teams to match client needs: finding the right people to develop the right solutions, and positioning ourselves in locations where clients plan to invest. 
Jacobs does this with a relentless focus on safety, a commitment to cost-saving and sustainable solutions, and a strong and diverse range of suppliers worldwide to help our clients achieve their goals.
















Client advocate








Return to top




Contact us
File transfer
Company store
Privacy & terms
© 2017 Jacobs. All rights reserved.









	Project gallery | Jacobs






































































Project Gallery
                










Exposition Construction Authority, Light Rail Line Phase 1, Los Angeles, CA, USA



Eesti Energia Õlitööstus AS, Narva Shale Plant Expansion, Narva, Estonia



Clarion Partners, Metro Park VI, Franconia, VA, USA



PIMA County, Ina Road Water Reclamation Facility, Pima County, AZ, USA.Â Image courtesy of MWH Constructors



Heathrow Airport Limited, Energy Infrastructure Project (EIP), Heathrow Airport, London, England, United Kingdom



Chinese Hospital Foundation, New Chinese Hospital, San Fransisco, CA, USA



Atlanta Beltline Inc., Historic Fourth Ward Park Phase 1 Project, Atlanta, GA, USA



Ashland Chemicals (Nanjing) Co., Ltd., Integrated Portfolio, Jiangsu and Guangdong Provinces, People's Republic of China



Saudi Arabian Mining Company, Ma'aden Wa'ad al Shammal Phospate Project, Sirhan-Turaif region, Saudi Arabia



Diesel, Diesel Corporate Headquarters, Breganze, Italy



BP, G-10 Project at Kwinana Refinery, Western Australia



Eastman Chemical Company, Eastman Chemical Company-Long-term Alliance, Kingsport, TN, USA


















Project gallery








Return to top




Contact us
File transfer
Company store
Privacy & terms
© 2017 Jacobs. All rights reserved.













Douglas Jacobs, Care New England Health System: Profile & Biography - Bloomberg


































































  


























Feedback





Douglas Jacobs

Treasurer,
Care New England Health System






Career History




Treasurer
Care New England Health System, PRESENT


Exec VP/Treasurer
Fleetboston Financial Corp, 1988-10/2003


Various Positions
Fleet Financial Group, 1988-1995


Various Positions
Citibank NA, 1972-1988


Executive Vice President
Fleet Mortgage Group Inc, 1988-UNKNOWN


Show More









Website:
www.carenewengland.org






Corporate Information
Address:

45 Willard Avenue
Providence, RI 02905
United States


Phone:
1-401-453-7900


Fax:
1-401-453-7686


Web url:
www.carenewengland.org











From The Web












Personal Information



Education



Amherst College
Bachelor's Degree


Wharton School of The University of Pennsylvania
MBA








Memberships



Board Memberships




Women & Infants Hospital of Rhode Island


Trustee, PRESENT




Care New England Health System


Trustee, PRESENT




Doral Financial Corp


Board Member, PRESENT




Onemain Holdings Inc


Board Member, 11/2015-PRESENT




New Residential Investment Corp


Board Member, 6/2013-PRESENT




American General Finance Inc


Board Member, 2010-PRESENT




Springleaf Finance Inc


Board Member, 11/2010-PRESENT




Springleaf Finance Corp


Board Member, 11/2010-PRESENT




Clear Channel Outdoor Holdings Inc


Board Member, 5/2010-PRESENT




Fortress Investment Group LLC


Board Member, 2/2007-PRESENT




Springleaf Holdings Inc


Board Member, 11/2010-11/2015




Doral Financial Corp


Board Member, 2/2009-2/2015




Aca Capital Holdings Inc


Board Member, 11/2004-2008




Hanover Capital Mortgage Hlds


Board Member, 11/2003-2007




Global Signal Inc


Board Member, 2/2004-1/2007




Fleet Mortgage Group


Board Member, 1998-2002



Show More





Other Memberships




Women & Infants Hospital


Board Member




Trinity Repertory Theatre


Board Member









Sponsored Financial Commentaries







More From The Web


















Home


News


Top Headlines
Most Popular
Exclusive
Law
Entrepreneurs
Leaders
Economy
Environment
Science
Sports
Markets Magazine
Pursuits Magazine
Bloomberg Visual Data
Bloomberg Best (and Worst)
For comments or complaints about news coverage click here


Regions
U.S.
China
Europe
Asia
U.K. & Ireland
Australia & New Zealand
Canada
India & Pakistan
Japan
Africa
Eastern Europe
Latin America
Middle East
Markets
Commodities
Currencies
Bonds
Stocks
Energy Markets
Municipal Bonds
Emerging Markets
Funds
Islamic Finance
Industries
Energy
Technology
Real Estate
Finance
Health Care
Transportation
Insurance
Retail
Media
Manufacturing




Quick


Market Data


Stocks
Stock Futures
World Indexes
Americas
Europe, Middle East, & Africa
Asia-Pacific
Gainers & Losers
Earnings Calendar
Industry Leaders
Currencies
Americas
Europe, Middle East, & Africa
Asia-Pacific
Foreign Exchange Cross Rates
FX Fixings
Currency Converter
Forex Trading Videos
Commodities
Energy Prices
Metals Prices
Agricultural Prices


Rates & Bonds
US Treasuries
UK Gilts
Germany Bunds
Japan Bonds
Australia Bonds
Bloomberg Bond Indexes
Corporate Bonds
Consumer Rates
Economic Calendar
Watchlist
European Debt Crisis
Symbol Search
The Market Now




Personal Finance


Top Headlines
Saving & Investing
Real Estate
Retirement Planning
Financial Advisers
Taxes
Blog: Ventured & Gained
Real Cost Of
Money Gallery
Calculators
Watchlist (Portfolio Tracker)




Tech


Top Headlines
Social Media
Mobile & Wireless
Web
Enterprise Tech
TV, Games & Movies
Apple
Tech Deals
Global Tech
Slideshows
Videos




U.S. Politics


Sustainability


Top Headlines
Energy
Corporate Sustainability
Policy
Natural Resources
Health & Population
Slideshows
Videos
Blog: The Grid




Luxury


Top Headlines
Autos
Billionaires
Living
Property
Travel
Well Spent
Loot Blog
Pursuits Magazine
Videos




TV


Live TV
Channel Finder
Personalities
Apple TV
iPad App
Schedule
U.S.
Asia
Europe


Shows
Surveillance
Market Makers
Lunch Money
Street Smart
Bloomberg West
Game Changers




Video


Must See
Latest
Live TV
Shows
Playlist




Radio


Live Radio
Shows
Schedule
Personalities
Podcasts
Bloomberg Brief
Featured Podcasts and New Shows
Bloomberg View
Masters in Business
First Word
Surveillance
Bloomberg Advantage
In the Loop
Bloomberg Law
Taking Stock
Bloomberg Best
More Podcasts




Blogs


Global Tech
The Grid
Loot
The Market Now
Political Capital
Tech Deals
Ventured and Gained




Opinion




My Saved



Registration



Sign In



Bloomberg.com



Businessweek.com



Company



About
Blog
Careers
Diversity & Inclusion
News Mission
Philanthropy & Engagement
Press Room
Procurement
Sustainability




Products



Financial Products
Bloomberg Professional Service
Bloomberg Anywhere
Bloomberg Tradebook
Bloomberg Briefs
Bloomberg Indexes
Bloomberg SEF
Service Center
Customer Support
Enterprise Products
Enterprise Solutions
Trading Solutions
Industry Products
Bloomberg BNA
Bloomberg Government
Bloomberg Law
Bloomberg Link
Bloomberg New Energy Finance
Bloomberg Sports
Content Licensing




Bloomberg Anywhere



Mobile Apps



Bloomberg Visual Data




































Douglas L. Jacobs of OneMain Holdings Inc Board of Directors

















 












Welcome!















Company News
Company Site
Premium
Log In


 



















Membership
Home
Portfolio
Stocks
Bonds
Funds
ETFs
CEF
Markets
Tools
Real Life Finance
Discuss





Investing Ideas


Fund Analyst Picks
Picks by Category
Fund Pick Performance
Picks & Pans E-Newsletter
Fund Spy Column
Fund Spy Book
Bond Squad
Fund Video Reports
FundInvestor Newsletter
ETF Investing
Fund Family Experts



Fund Reports


All Fund Analyst Reports
Fund Stewardship Reports



Fund Ratings


Highest-Rated Value
Highest-Rated Growth
Highest-Rated Large-Cap
Highest-Rated Mid-Cap
Highest-Rated Small-Cap
Foreign Fund Standouts
Star Rating Performance
Rating Methodology



Fund Performance


Top 1-Month Performers
Top YTD Performers
Top 1-Year Performers
Top 3-Year Performers
Top 5-Year Performers
Fund Category Returns
Biggest Daily NAV Changes
Closed-End Funds
Exchange-Traded Funds
Quarterly Market Outlook



Fund Screeners


Basic Screeners
Fund Screener
Long-Term Winners
Solid Small-Growth Funds
Conservative Bond Funds

Premium Screeners
Premium Fund Screener
Index Funds
Hidden Gems
Lower-Risk Foreign Funds


Video Center
 
 

 



 



OneMain Holdings Inc
 OMF


Add to PortfolioGet E-mail AlertsPrint This PagePDF ReportData QuestionQuoteChartStock AnalysisPerformanceKey RatiosFinancialsValuationInsidersOwnershipFilingsBondsOverviewExecutive CompensationInsider ActivityKey ExecutivesBoard of DirectorsCommittees
 


Board of Directors
                > Douglas L. Jacobs
            
Douglas L. Jacobs, Independent Director



Profile
Connections






Biography



    Mr. Jacobs was elected to the Board as a director on November 30, 2010. Mr. Jacobs is also a director of Fortress (a global investment management firm), where he chairs the Audit Committee and is a member of the Compensation Committee. Investment funds managed by affiliates of Fortress indirectly owned approximately 54.6% of the voting interests in the Company as of December 31, 2015. He is also a director of Clear Channel Outdoor (an international outdoor advertising company), where he chairs the Audit Committee and is a member of the Compensation Committee, and New Residential (a real estate investment trust primarily focused on investing in residential real estate related assets that is majority owned by funds managed by an affiliate of Fortress), where he chairs the Audit Committee. He also serves as a director, Treasurer and Chairman of the Finance Committee of Care New England (a health care system). Mr. Jacobs was a director of Doral Financial Corporation (a financial services company) until February 2015, where he was a member of the Dividend Committee, and, from November 2004 to mid-2008, Mr. Jacobs was also a director of ACA Capital Holdings, Inc. (a financial guaranty company), where he was Chairman of the Audit Committee and a member of the Compensation and Risk Management Committees. Mr. Jacobs was a director and Chairman of the Audit Committee for Global Signal Inc. (an owner, operator and lessor of towers and other communication structures for wireless communications) from February 2004 until January 2007, and also was a director of Hanover Capital Mortgage Holdings, Inc. (a mortgage REIT) from 2003 until 2007. From 1988 to 2003, Mr. Jacobs was an Executive Vice President and Treasurer at FleetBoston Financial Group (a financial services firm), managing the company's funding, securitization, capital, and asset and liability management activities in addition to its securities, derivatives, and mortgage loan portfolios. Prior to joining FleetBoston, Mr. Jacobs was active in a variety of positions at Citicorp (a global banking institution) for over 17 years, culminating in his role as Division Executive of the Mortgage Finance Group.
    





Board Membership



Company Name
Board Member Since
Board Committees







Clear Channel Outdoor Holdings Inc
-
AUDIT,BOARD,COMPENSATION,INTERCOMPANY NOTE







Doral Financial Corp
-
AUDIT,BOARD,COMPENSATION,RISK POLICY







Fortress Investment Group LLC
-
AUDIT,BOARD,COMPENSATION







Douglas L. Jacobs is connected to 19 Board Members.See list of all Board Connections.

 


  







We value your feedback. Let us know what you think.













 


Site Directory
Site Map
Our Products












 



 



 




Corrections
Help
Advertising Opportunities
Licensing Opportunities
Glossary
RSS
Mobile Portfolio
Affiliate
Careers 
 


International Sites:
        	Australia
Canada
China
France
Germany
Hong Kong
Italy
The Netherlands
Norway
Spain
U.K.
Switzerland

 




Stocks by:
            Name
|
Ticker
|
Star Rating
|
Market Cap
|
Stock Type
|
Sector
|
Industry



Mutual Funds by:
            Star Rating
|
Investment Style
|
Total Assets
|
Category
|
Top Holdings
|
Top Sectors
|
Symbol / Ticker
|
Name



ETFs by:
            Star Rating
|
Category
|
Total Assets
|
Symbol / Ticker
|
Name



Articles by:
            Title
|
Date
|
Author
|
Collection
|
Interest
|
Popularity



Investment Categories by:
            Topic
|
Sector
|
Key Indicators
|
User Interest
|
Market Cap
|
Industry



Premium Stocks by:
            Name
|
Ticker
|
Star Rating
|
Market Cap
|
Stock Type
|
Sector
|
Industry



Premium Mutual Funds by:
            Star Rating
|
Investment Style
|
Total Assets
|
Category
|
Top Holdings
|
Top Sectors
|
Symbol / Ticker
|
Name



Premium ETFs by:
            Star Rating
|
Category
|
Total Assets
|
Symbol / Ticker
|
Name



Popular Articles by:
            Title
|
Date
|
Author
|
Collection
|
Interest
|
Popularity



Popular Investment Categories by:
            Topic
|
Sector
|
Key Indicators
|
User Interest
|
Market Cap
|
Industry




Independent. Insightful. Trusted. Morningstar provides stock market analysis; equity, mutual fund, and ETF research, ratings, and picks; portfolio tools; and option, hedge fund, IRA, 401k, and 529 plan research. Our reliable data and analysis can help both experienced enthusiasts and newcomers.
        © Copyright  Morningstar, Inc. All rights reserved. Please read our Terms of Useand Privacy Policy.Dow Jones Industrial Average, S&P 500, Nasdaq, and Morningstar Index (Market Barometer) quotes are real-time. Russell 2000 quote is 10 minutes delayed.
 


 















Douglas L Jacobs | Free Public Records | PublicRecords360
















Login | Register








Search Options




First Name *



Middle Name



Last Name *



City



State

All States 
Alabama 
Alaska 
Arizona 
Arkansas 
California 
Colorado 
Connecticut 
Delaware 
Florida 
Georgia 
Hawaii 
Idaho 
Illinois 
Indiana 
Iowa 
Kansas 
Kentucky 
Louisiana 
Maine 
Maryland 
Massachusetts 
Michigan 
Minnesota 
Mississippi 
Missouri 
Montana 
Nebraska 
Nevada 
New Hampshire 
New Jersey 
New Mexico 
New York 
North Carolina 
North Dakota 
Ohio 
Oklahoma 
Oregon 
Pennsylvania 
Puerto Rico 
Rhode Island 
South Carolina 
South Dakota 
Tennessee 
Texas 
Utah 
Vermont 
Virginia 
Washington 
Washington D.C. 
West Virginia 
Wisconsin 
Wyoming 








 


Safe Search


Your search is confidential. Douglas L Jacobs will not be notified of your purchase.

 
Related SearchesDoug JacobsDoug JacobsDoug L JacobsDoug L JacobsDoug Jacobs

Connect With Us











20 Matching Results!




Select a record below to get Complete Report
Aliases
Has lived in
Related to




 


View Details


Douglas Linden JacobsAge 58

Doug Jacobs
Salisbury, NCBrodnax, VAGlen Burnie, MDOaklyn, NJNelson, VABuffalo Junction, VAGranite Quarry, NC
Gail JacobsLora JacobsAngela BaileyKen BaileyJoshua Jacobs


 


View Details


Douglas Lee JacobsAge 69


Providence, RITarrytown, NYNew York, NYWarwick, RILarchmont, NYJenkinsville, SCMelbourne, FL
Constance Reeves-pemmerlMartha JacobsConnie JacobsAllen JacobsCharlotte Jacobs


 


View Details


Douglas Lee JacobsAge 53

Doug Jacobs
Hilbert, WISherwood, WIChilton, WI
Jennifer JacobsEugene JacobsKay JacobsJustin Jacobs


 


View Details


Douglas Laverne JacobsAge 70

Doug Jacobs
Madison, SD
Thomas Jacobs


 


View Details


Douglas L JacobsAge 56

Douglas Bion Jacobs
Newport, NCHersey, MIHavelock, NCBeaufort, SCPort Royal, SCLaurinburg, NC
Eva JacobsJessica LawsonBion JacobsRuth JacobsAshley Jacobs


 


View Details


Douglas Lee JacobsAge 70

Doug Jacobs
Lubbock, TXFarmington, NMPhoenix, AZCape Coral, FLSeminole, TX
George JacobsNadja JacobsAlex JacobsCatherine HeadRyan Jacobs


 


View Details


Douglas L JacobsAge 40

Doug L Jacobs
Columbus, OHGalion, OHGreenwood, INMount Vernon, OHBlack Lick, OHCrestline, OH
Amber JacobsCarolyn JacobsStephanie JacobsJennifer JacobsDavid Jacobs


 


View Details


Douglas Lee JacobsAge 49


Bealeton, VAWarrenton, VARemington, VA
Sonya JacobsBrittany Jacobs


 


View Details


Douglas L JacobsAge 49

Douglas D JacobsDoug Jacobs
West Milton, OHSpringfield, OHColumbus, INFairborn, OHMiamisburg, OHDayton, OHTroy, OH
Heather JacobsFerne JacobsBetty JacobsGwendolyn TurnerJennifer Jacobs


 


View Details


Douglas Lien JacobsAge 43

Doug Lien Jacobs
Austin, MNMinneapolis, MNShakopee, MNWichita, KS
Gayle JacobsHunter Jacobs


 


View Details


Douglas Lee JacobsAge 54


Roseville, MIClinton Township, MIWarren, MISaint Clair Shores, MISterling Heights, MI
Cathy FarmerShirley JacobsGeorge Jacobs


 


View Details


Douglas Lynn JacobsAge 59


Saint Charles, MOSaint Louis, MOChesterfield, MOOwensville, MO
Bethany JacobsLacey JacobsIvan JumperJewell JumperBenjamin Jacobs


 


View Details


Douglas Leroy JacobsAge 61

Doug JacobsDouglas L HeathDouglas Leroy Jacobs-heathDoug Jacobs-heath
Phoenix, AZGlen Dale, AZTempe, AZSurprise, AZ
Nancy Jacobs-heathSusan JacobsGeorge JacobsDavid HeathHelen Heath


 


View Details


Douglas L JacobsAge 78


Harrison, TNOoltewah, TNHartwell, GARinggold, GA
Judith JacobsJoshua Jacobs


 


View Details


Douglas Lee JacobsAge 58

Douglas Jacobs Cobs
Marietta, GAClarkston, GASnellville, GA
Jonie JacobsTiffany JacobsJoan Jacobs


 


View Details


Douglas L JacobsAge 63


Poughkeepsie, NYMilton, NYStaatsburg, NYRio Rancho, NM
Kelly JacobsNancy JacobsSteven Jacobs


 


View Details


Douglas Lynn JacobsAge 67

Doug L Jacobs
Marshalltown, IAPlano, TX
Carrie HamlinAnn ThompsonAndrew Jacobs


 


View Details


Douglas Leroy JacobsAge 54


Burlington, NC
Megan JacobsJodie JacobsClaude SpoonJane Spoon


 


View Details


Douglas Lee JacobsAge 60


Niagara, WI
Ronda JacobsMakayla JacobsLogan JacobsChad JacobsMelissa Jacobs


 


View Details


Douglas L Jacobs


Seminole, FL
Lorraine Jacobs




 

PublicRecords360
is designed to help you safely find people and learn about others. PublicRecords360
does not provide consumer reports and is not a consumer reporting agency as defined by the Fair Credit Reporting Act (FCRA). This site should not be used to determine an individual's eligibility for credit, insurance, employment, housing or any other purpose covered by the FCRA.
Learn more about FCRA restrictions. By using our website you agree to our Terms
of Service and Privacy Policy.









© copyright 2012 - 2017 PublicRecords360.com

Home

Notes

Terms

Privacy

Contact















Marc Jacobs Daisy White Eau de Toilette (EdT) på nett - douglas.no



















































         Douglas.no bruker cookies for å gi deg en bedre brukeropplevelse. Ved å fortsette godtar du bruken av cookies. Mer informasjon     OK            2 valgfrie gratisprøver     Velg blant eksklusive prøver for kvinner og menn.       Gratis frakt over kr 600,-     Gratis frakt på ordre over kr 600,- innenfor Norge       Leveringstid 3-5 virkedager     Rask og sikker levering med Posten og Bring       Gratis gaveinnpakning     Få gratis gveinnpakning, velg et kort og legg ved en personlig hilsen.       Ingen toll     Ingen toll           Butikk       Nyhetsbrev       Tilbud                     Handlekurv   0      Ønskeliste   0      Min Douglas         Mer service      Mer service       Butikk       Nyhetsbrev       Tilbud                                 





Zur Hauptnavigation springen
Zum Seiteninhalt springen










 SOMMERRABATT! 20% PÅ ALLE KJØP OVER 999,-
					










            Du er her:
            


                        Home
                    


                     > Marc Jacobs
                     > Parfyme for henne
                     > Daisy
                 > 
                    Marc Jacobs
                    Daisy
                       White
        















< Tilbake












[ + ] Vis i full størrelse






Daisy


            White
        

            Eau de Toilette (EdT)
        













 




Anmeldelser
Spørsmål og svar














Marc Jacobs Daisy



100 ml
Art-Nr. 968311


kr 993


På lager



1 Stk
2 Stk
3 Stk
4 Stk
5 Stk
6 Stk
7 Stk
8 Stk
9 Stk
10 Stk





Legger du dette produktet i din nåværende handlekurv, oppnår du gratis frakt. 





Sjekk lagersaldo i butikk





Legg til på ønskelisten
Del via e-post








DINE FORDELER

2 valgfrie gratisprøver
Gratis frakt over kr 600,- 
Leveringstid 3-5 virkedager
Gratis gaveinnpakning
Ingen toll








 



Leveringsvilkår

Gratis frakt for ordre over kr 600. For ordrer under kr 600 tilkommer fraktgebyr på kr kr 49,-.
Ordren leveres inne 3-5 arbeidsdager



 











Lukk vindu











                  













  Kjøp Marc Jacobs parfyme på nett – douglas.no                          Douglas.no bruker cookies for å gi deg en bedre brukeropplevelse. Ved å fortsette godtar du bruken av cookies. Mer informasjon     OK            2 valgfrie gratisprøver     Velg blant eksklusive prøver for kvinner og menn.       Gratis frakt over kr 600,-     Gratis frakt på ordre over kr 600,- innenfor Norge       Leveringstid 3-5 virkedager     Rask og sikker levering med Posten og Bring       Gratis gaveinnpakning     Få gratis gveinnpakning, velg et kort og legg ved en personlig hilsen.       Ingen toll     Ingen toll           Butikk       Nyhetsbrev       Tilbud                     Handlekurv   0      Ønskeliste   0      Min Douglas         Mer service      Mer service       Butikk       Nyhetsbrev       Tilbud                                        SOMMERRABATT!  20% PÅ ALLE KJØP OVER 999,-      Du er her:   Home   >     Merker   >    Marc Jacobs                  Gå til hovednavigasjon Gå til hovedinnhold          Kjære douglas.no kunde, JavaScript er ikke aktivert i din nettleser. Aktiver JavaScript i nettleserens instillinger for optimal visning av douglas.no.            Marc Jacobs    Parfyme for henne     Parfyme for han           Unternavigation   Begrens resultatene   Til hvem    kvinne (21)    unisex (2)     Pris PriceURL       NOK -  NOK g       bare Salg (2)      Tilbud    ny (1)    Begrenset (2)     Produkt    Body lotion (3)    Duft sett (2)    Eau de Parfum (EDP) (6)    Eau de Toilette (EdT) (11)    Shower Gel (2)                  Les mer om Marc Jacobs      Marc Jacobs er en av de mest trendy designerne i sin generasjon. Hans kreasjoner kan like gjerne bli kultgjenstander. I tillegg til en luksuriøs stil er Marc Jacobs spesielt kjent for overraskende detaljer og et unikt særpreg.  Hans design er fylt til randen med energi og kreativitet. Den er elegant, men ikke kunstig, og alltid med en uformell chic, naturlig sjarm.   Mark Jacobs dufter er som hans øvrige kreasjoner: stilige luksussymboler for kresne trendsettere.                Marc Jacobs (24)   Sorter etter :  Best resultat   Pris høy til lav   Pris lav til høy   Beste vurdering   Best resultat                         Marc Jacobs   Daisy White Eau de Toilette (EdT)             kr 993 / 100 ml                   Marc Jacobs   Daisy Dream Daisy Dream - Body Lotion Body lotion             kr 360 / 150 ml                   Marc Jacobs   Daisy Daisy - Shower Gel Shower Gel             kr 330 / 150 ml                   Marc Jacobs   Daisy Daisy - Body Lotion Body lotion             kr 330 / 150 ml                          Marc Jacobs   Daisy Eau so Fresh EdT Spray 20ml + 15ml Refill Eau de Toilette (EdT)             kr 429 / 35 ml                   Marc Jacobs   Daisy Eau so Fresh Daisy Eau so Fresh - Body Lotion Body lotion             kr 330 / 150 ml                   Marc Jacobs   Man Man Eau de Toilette (EdT)             fra kr 699 / 75 ml                   Marc Jacobs   Divine Decadence Divine Decadence Eau de Parfum (EDP)             fra kr 595 / 30 ml                          Marc Jacobs   Dot Dot Eau de Parfum (EDP)             fra kr 465 / 30 ml                   Marc Jacobs   Decadence Decadence Eau de Parfum (EDP)             fra kr 595 / 30 ml                   Marc Jacobs   Splash Collection Rain Eau de Toilette (EdT)             kr 550 / 100 ml                   Marc Jacobs   Splash Collection Cotton Eau de Toilette (EdT)             kr 550 / 100 ml                          Marc Jacobs   Daisy Daisy Eau de Parfum (EDP)             kr 795 / 50 ml                   Marc Jacobs   Daisy Dream Daisy Dream Eau de Toilette (EdT)             fra kr 525 / 30 ml                   Marc Jacobs   Decadence Decadence - Shower Gel Shower Gel             kr 395 / 150 ml                    Marc Jacobs   Daisy Blush Eau de Toilette (EdT)             kr 690 / 50 ml                          Marc Jacobs   Daisy Daisy Set Duft sett             kr 680 / 1 eske                   Marc Jacobs   Honey Honey Eau de Parfum (EDP)             fra kr 465 / 30 ml                   Marc Jacobs   Daisy Dream Forever Daisy Dream Forever Eau de Parfum (EDP)             kr 750 / 50 ml                   Marc Jacobs   Daisy Dream Duft sett             kr 680 / 1 eske                     16%          Marc Jacobs   Daisy Daisy Eau de Toilette (EdT)             fra kr 566 / 50 ml              25%          Marc Jacobs   Daisy Eau so Fresh Daisy Eau So Fresh Eau de Toilette (EdT)             fra kr 695 / 75 ml                   Marc Jacobs   Daisy Purse Spray 20 ml + 15ml Refill Eau de Toilette (EdT)             kr 388 / 20 ml                    Marc Jacobs   Daisy Dream Blush Eau de Toilette (EdT)             kr 690 / 50 ml                          TILBAKE                                      Kjøp Marc Jacobs Parfyme for henne på nett – douglas.no                         Douglas.no bruker cookies for å gi deg en bedre brukeropplevelse. Ved å fortsette godtar du bruken av cookies. Mer informasjon     OK            2 valgfrie gratisprøver     Velg blant eksklusive prøver for kvinner og menn.       Gratis frakt over kr 600,-     Gratis frakt på ordre over kr 600,- innenfor Norge       Leveringstid 3-5 virkedager     Rask og sikker levering med Posten og Bring       Gratis gaveinnpakning     Få gratis gveinnpakning, velg et kort og legg ved en personlig hilsen.       Ingen toll     Ingen toll           Butikk       Nyhetsbrev       Tilbud                     Handlekurv   0      Ønskeliste   0      Min Douglas         Mer service      Mer service       Butikk       Nyhetsbrev       Tilbud                                        SOMMERRABATT!  20% PÅ ALLE KJØP OVER 999,-      Du er her:   Home   >     Merker   >     Marc Jacobs   >    Parfyme for henne                  Gå til hovednavigasjon Gå til hovedinnhold          Kjære douglas.no kunde, JavaScript er ikke aktivert i din nettleser. Aktiver JavaScript i nettleserens instillinger for optimal visning av douglas.no.            Marc Jacobs    Parfyme for henne    Decadence     Daisy Dream     Daisy     Daisy Eau so Fresh     Honey     Dot     Splash Collection     Daisy Dream Forever     Divine Decadence      Parfyme for han           Unternavigation   Begrens resultatene   Til hvem    kvinne (21)    unisex (2)     Pris PriceURL       NOK -  NOK g       bare Salg (2)      Tilbud    ny (1)    Begrenset (2)     Produkt    Body lotion (3)    Duft sett (2)    Eau de Parfum (EDP) (6)    Eau de Toilette (EdT) (10)    Shower Gel (2)                            Parfyme for henne (23)   Sorter etter :  Best resultat   Pris høy til lav   Pris lav til høy   Beste vurdering   Best resultat                         Marc Jacobs   Daisy White Eau de Toilette (EdT)             kr 993 / 100 ml                   Marc Jacobs   Daisy Dream Daisy Dream - Body Lotion Body lotion             kr 360 / 150 ml                   Marc Jacobs   Daisy Daisy - Shower Gel Shower Gel             kr 330 / 150 ml                   Marc Jacobs   Daisy Daisy - Body Lotion Body lotion             kr 330 / 150 ml                          Marc Jacobs   Daisy Eau so Fresh EdT Spray 20ml + 15ml Refill Eau de Toilette (EdT)             kr 429 / 35 ml                   Marc Jacobs   Daisy Eau so Fresh Daisy Eau so Fresh - Body Lotion Body lotion             kr 330 / 150 ml                   Marc Jacobs   Divine Decadence Divine Decadence Eau de Parfum (EDP)             fra kr 595 / 30 ml                   Marc Jacobs   Dot Dot Eau de Parfum (EDP)             fra kr 465 / 30 ml                          Marc Jacobs   Decadence Decadence Eau de Parfum (EDP)             fra kr 595 / 30 ml                   Marc Jacobs   Splash Collection Rain Eau de Toilette (EdT)             kr 550 / 100 ml                   Marc Jacobs   Splash Collection Cotton Eau de Toilette (EdT)             kr 550 / 100 ml                   Marc Jacobs   Daisy Daisy Eau de Parfum (EDP)             kr 795 / 50 ml                          Marc Jacobs   Daisy Dream Daisy Dream Eau de Toilette (EdT)             fra kr 525 / 30 ml                   Marc Jacobs   Decadence Decadence - Shower Gel Shower Gel             kr 395 / 150 ml                    Marc Jacobs   Daisy Blush Eau de Toilette (EdT)             kr 690 / 50 ml                   Marc Jacobs   Daisy Daisy Set Duft sett             kr 680 / 1 eske                          Marc Jacobs   Honey Honey Eau de Parfum (EDP)             fra kr 465 / 30 ml                   Marc Jacobs   Daisy Dream Forever Daisy Dream Forever Eau de Parfum (EDP)             kr 750 / 50 ml                   Marc Jacobs   Daisy Dream Duft sett             kr 680 / 1 eske              16%          Marc Jacobs   Daisy Daisy Eau de Toilette (EdT)             fra kr 566 / 50 ml                     25%          Marc Jacobs   Daisy Eau so Fresh Daisy Eau So Fresh Eau de Toilette (EdT)             fra kr 695 / 75 ml                   Marc Jacobs   Daisy Purse Spray 20 ml + 15ml Refill Eau de Toilette (EdT)             kr 388 / 20 ml                    Marc Jacobs   Daisy Dream Blush Eau de Toilette (EdT)             kr 690 / 50 ml                          TILBAKE                                      Kjøp Marc Jacobs Daisy på nett – douglas.no                         Douglas.no bruker cookies for å gi deg en bedre brukeropplevelse. Ved å fortsette godtar du bruken av cookies. Mer informasjon     OK            2 valgfrie gratisprøver     Velg blant eksklusive prøver for kvinner og menn.       Gratis frakt over kr 600,-     Gratis frakt på ordre over kr 600,- innenfor Norge       Leveringstid 3-5 virkedager     Rask og sikker levering med Posten og Bring       Gratis gaveinnpakning     Få gratis gveinnpakning, velg et kort og legg ved en personlig hilsen.       Ingen toll     Ingen toll           Butikk       Nyhetsbrev       Tilbud                     Handlekurv   0      Ønskeliste   0      Min Douglas         Mer service      Mer service       Butikk       Nyhetsbrev       Tilbud                                        SOMMERRABATT!  20% PÅ ALLE KJØP OVER 999,-      Du er her:   Home   >     Merker   >     Marc Jacobs   >     Parfyme for henne   >    Daisy                  Gå til hovednavigasjon Gå til hovedinnhold          Kjære douglas.no kunde, JavaScript er ikke aktivert i din nettleser. Aktiver JavaScript i nettleserens instillinger for optimal visning av douglas.no.            Marc Jacobs    Parfyme for henne    Decadence     Daisy Dream     Daisy     Daisy Eau so Fresh     Honey     Dot     Splash Collection     Daisy Dream Forever     Divine Decadence      Parfyme for han           Unternavigation   Begrens resultatene   Pris PriceURL       NOK -  NOK g       bare Salg (1)      Tilbud    ny (1)    Begrenset (1)     Produkt    Body lotion (1)    Duft sett (1)    Eau de Parfum (EDP) (1)    Eau de Toilette (EdT) (4)    Shower Gel (1)                  Les mer      Slipp solskinnet inn! Daisy fra Marc Jacobs er en luksuriøst tolkning av flower power. Avslappende,  bekymringsløs og med et snev av leken uskyld, gir denne delikat duften av blomster-eng en munter stemning. En blomsterbukett, full av energi og friskhet, innhyllet i varme og komfort. Daisy tar deg til et sted der fantasien ikke setter grenser.                Daisy (8)   Sorter etter :  Best resultat   Pris høy til lav   Pris lav til høy   Beste vurdering   Best resultat                         Marc Jacobs   Daisy White Eau de Toilette (EdT)             kr 993 / 100 ml                   Marc Jacobs   Daisy Daisy - Shower Gel Shower Gel             kr 330 / 150 ml                   Marc Jacobs   Daisy Daisy - Body Lotion Body lotion             kr 330 / 150 ml                   Marc Jacobs   Daisy Daisy Eau de Parfum (EDP)             kr 795 / 50 ml                           Marc Jacobs   Daisy Blush Eau de Toilette (EdT)             kr 690 / 50 ml                   Marc Jacobs   Daisy Daisy Set Duft sett             kr 680 / 1 eske              16%          Marc Jacobs   Daisy Daisy Eau de Toilette (EdT)             fra kr 566 / 50 ml                   Marc Jacobs   Daisy Purse Spray 20 ml + 15ml Refill Eau de Toilette (EdT)             kr 388 / 20 ml                          TILBAKE                                    




About Fortress - Leadership - Board of Directors - FORTRESS INVESTMENT GROUP LLC






























ABOUT FORTRESS


Fortress Overview


History


Leadership


Community Engagement


Offices




OUR BUSINESSES


Alternative Asset Management


Traditional Asset Management


Principal Investments




PUBLIC SHAREHOLDERS


IR Overview


Corporate Governance


Financial Reports & Filings


Events & Presentations


News


Insights & Viewpoints


Share Information


Tax Information


Investor FAQs


Information Request


Regulation FD Policy




LP Login




Board of Directors








Home / About Fortress / Leadership / Board of Directors
						








Fortress Overview


History


Leadership


Board of Directors


Management Committee




Community Engagement


Offices





Board of Directors



						Non-Independent Directors
					


Peter L. Briger, Jr.
Principal and Co-Chairman of the Board of Directors


Wesley R. Edens
Co-Founder, Principal and Co-Chairman of the Board of Directors


Randal A. Nardone
Chief Executive Officer, Co-Founder, Principal and Director



						Independent Directors
					


David B. Barry
Director


Douglas L. Jacobs
Director


Michael G. Rantz
Director


George W. Wellde, Jr.
Director





Douglas L. Jacobs
Director


Douglas L. Jacobs has been a member of the Board of Directors of Fortress Investment Group LLC since February 2007.
Mr. Jacobs is a director of Doral Financial Corporation, a financial services company, where he is Chairman of the Risk Policy Committee and member of the Audit and Dividend Committees. From November 2004 to mid-2008, Mr. Jacobs was also a director of ACA Capital Holdings, Inc., a financial guaranty company, where he was Chairman of the Audit Committee and a member of the Compensation Committee and Risk Management Committees. Mr. Jacobs was a director and Chairman of the Audit Committee for Global Signal Inc. from February 2004 until January 2007. Mr. Jacobs has also been a director of Hanover Capital Mortgage Holdings, Inc from 2003 until 2007. From 1988 to 2003, Mr. Jacobs was an Executive Vice President and Treasurer at FleetBoston Financial Group, managing the company's funding, securitization, capital, and asset and liability management activities in addition to its securities, derivatives, and mortgage loan portfolios. Prior to joining FleetBoston, Mr. Jacobs was active in a variety of positions at Citicorp over seventeen years, culminating in his role as Division Executive of the Mortgage Finance Group.
Mr. Jacobs holds a B.A. from Amherst College and an M.B.A. from the Wharton School of Business at the University of Pennsylvania.









COPYRIGHT © 2017 FORTRESS INVESTMENT GROUP LLC


CAREERS


CONTACT US


SITE MAP


TERMS OF USE


PRIVACY STATEMENT










DOUGLAS L  JACOBS - CEO, founder, businessman - profile

















directorpedia.net - List of CEOs, founders, board members and company directors











DOUGLAS L  JACOBS
Check out list of companies and businesses related to DOUGLAS L  JACOBS. Find out DOUGLAS L  JACOBS address and contact details. View other people related to DOUGLAS L  JACOBS - coworkers, colleagues, companions, etc.
Address:   

67 ORCHARD AVENUE  PROVIDENCE 02906-5417 RI




Companies related to DOUGLAS L  JACOBS
CIKCompany NamePositionCompany Address0001278382GLOBAL SIGNAL INCDirector 301 N CATTLEMEN RD STE 300 SARASOTA 342320001334978Clear Channel Outdoor Holdings, Inc.Director 200 EAST BASSE ROAD SUITE 100 SAN ANTONIO 782090001380393Fortress Investment Group LLCDirector 1345 AVENUE OF THE AMERICAS 46TH FLOOR NEW YORK 101050001556593New Residential Investment Corp.Director 1345 Avenue of the Americas  New York 101050001584207OneMain Holdings, Inc.Director 601 N.W. SECOND STREET  EVANSVILLE 47708




DOUGLAS L  JACOBS on the Web
Persons related to DOUGLAS L  JACOBS - GLOBAL SIGNAL INCNamePositionCity222 Partners, LLCBOSTONABRAMS CAPITAL LLC10% Owner BOSTONAbrams Capital Partners I, L.P.BOSTONAbrams Capital Partners II, L.P.BOSTONDavid C  AbramsDirector BOSTONRonald G  Bizick IIExec V.P., and C.O.O. SARASOTARonald G  Bizick IIFormer Chief Operating Officer SARASOTACamille  BlommerController SARASOTACamille  BlommerController SARASOTACamille  BlommerFormer Controller SARASOTASCOTT L  BOKNEW YORKSCOTT L  BOKNEW YORKBrett Leigh  BuggelnEVP, Sales and  Tower Leasing SARASOTAStephen W  CrawfordSARASOTAWESLEY R  EDENSDirector NEW YORKWESLEY R  EDENSCEO and COB of Directors NEW YORKWESLEY R  EDENSCEO, Pres., & Chair of BOD NEW YORKWESLEY R  EDENSDirector NEW YORKJERRY  ELLIOTTDirector, CEO and President SARASOTAFIG ADVISORS LLC/NYNEW YORKFIG ADVISORS LLC/NYNEW YORKFortress Fund MM LLCNEW YORKFortress Fund MM LLCFortress Fund MM LLCNEW YORKFortress Fund MM LLCNEW YORKFortress Fund MM LLCNEW YORKFORTRESS INVESTMENT FUND LLCNEW YORKFORTRESS INVESTMENT FUND LLCFORTRESS INVESTMENT FUND LLCNEW YORKFORTRESS INVESTMENT FUND LLCNEW YORKFORTRESS INVESTMENT FUND LLCNEW YORKFORTRESS INVESTMENT GROUP LLCNEW YORKFORTRESS INVESTMENT GROUP LLCFORTRESS INVESTMENT GROUP LLCNEW YORKFORTRESS INVESTMENT GROUP LLCNEW YORKFORTRESS INVESTMENT GROUP LLC10% Owner NEW YORKFortress Investment Holdings LLC10% Owner NEW YORKFortress Investment Holdings LLC10% Owner NEW YORKFortress Investment Holdings LLC10% Owner NEW YORKFortress Investment Holdings LLC10% Owner NEW YORKFortress Pinnacle Acquisition LLCNEW YORKFortress Pinnacle Acquisition LLCFORTRESS REGISTERED INVESTMENT TRUSTNEW YORKFORTRESS REGISTERED INVESTMENT TRUSTFORTRESS REGISTERED INVESTMENT TRUSTNEW YORKFORTRESS REGISTERED INVESTMENT TRUSTNEW YORKFORTRESS REGISTERED INVESTMENT TRUSTNEW YORKJEFFREY H  FOSTERSARASOTAJEFFREY H  FOSTERSVP& Chief Accounting Officer SARASOTAWilliam T  FreemanEVP, CFO and Assist. Secretary SARASOTAWilliam T  FreemanExec VP, CFO SARASOTAFRIT PINN LLCFRIT PINN LLCNEW YORKFRIT PINN LLCNEW YORKFRIT PINN LLCNEW YORKGCP 2000, LLCNEW YORKGCP 2000, LLCNEW YORKGCP, L.P.NEW YORKGCP, L.P.NEW YORKGCP MANAGING PARTNER, L.P.NEW YORKGCP MANAGING PARTNER, L.P.NEW YORKROBERT H  GIDELDirector TAMPAROBERT H  GIDELDirector ORLANDODAVID J  GRAINPresident SARASOTADAVID J  GRAINPresident SARASOTAGreat Hollow International, L.P.BOSTONGreat Hollow International, L.P.Great Hollow Partners, LLC BOSTONGREENHILL CAPITAL PARTNERS, LLCNEW YORKGREENHILL CAPITAL PARTNERS, LLC10% Owner NEW YORKGREENHILL CAPITAL PARTNERS LPNEW YORKGREENHILL CAPITAL PARTNERS LPNEW YORKGREENHILL & CO INCNEW YORKROBERT F  GREENHILLNEW YORKROBERT F  GREENHILLNEW YORKThomas  GuardSARASOTAThomas  GuardTreasurer SARASOTAThomas  GuardSVP & Treasurer SARASOTAMichael P  HenniganExec. Vice Pres., Operations SARASOTADOUGLAS L  JACOBSDirector PROVIDENCEDOUGLAS L  JACOBSDirector PROVIDENCEJeffrey Allen  KlopfEVP, Gen. Counsel & Secretary SARASOTAJeffrey S  LangdonExec. V.P., Sales & Marketing SARASOTAJeffrey S  LangdonExec. Vice Pres. Sales & Mktg SARASOTAGreerson Greene  McMullenEVP, Gen. Counsel & Secretary SARASOTAGreerson Greene  McMullenExec. VP, General Counsel SARASOTAROBERT H  NIEHAUSDirector NEW YORKROBERT H  NIEHAUSNEW YORKROBERT H  NIEHAUSNEW YORKROBERT H  NIEHAUSDirector NEW YORKSTEVEN G  OSGOODEVP & Chief Financial Officer SARASOTAHOWARD  RUBINDirector NEW YORKHOWARD  RUBINDirector NEW YORKHOWARD  RUBINDirector NEW YORKMichael P  SchmidtEVP, Chief Information Officer SARASOTAMassoud  SedighEVP & Chief Info. Officer SARASOTAMassoud  SedighEVP and Chief Info. Officer SARASOTAWhitecrest Partners, LPBOSTONMARK S  WHITINGDirector SAN FRANCISCOMARK S  WHITINGDirector SAN FRANCISCOMARK S  WHITINGDirector SAN FRANCISCOMARK S  WHITING SAN FRANCISCOPersons related to DOUGLAS L  JACOBS - Clear Channel Outdoor Holdings, Inc.NamePositionCityJOE W  BAGANCOO - Americas SAN ANTONIOJonathan David  BevanCFO - International PHOENIXJonathan David  BevanSee Remarks SAN ANTONIORICHARD J  BRESSLERSee Remarks NEW YORKRICHARD J  BRESSLERCFO SAN ANTONIOBROADER MEDIA, LLCSAN ANTONIOJames C.  CarlisleBOSTONThomas W  CaseySAN ANTONIOThomas W  CaseySee remarks SAN ANTONIO,CC FINCO, LLC10% Owner SAN ANTONIOCC Media Holdings Inc10% Owner SAN ANTONIODavid Meldrum  ClarkEVP, GC-Americas & Asst. Secy. SAN ANTONIODavid Meldrum  ClarkEVP, GC-Americas & Asst. Secy SAN ANTONIO,Clear Channel Capital I, LLCSAN ANTONIOClear Channel Capital II, LLCSAN ANTONIOCLEAR CHANNEL COMMUNICATIONS INCSAN ANTONIOClear Channel Holdings, Inc.SAN ANTONIORonald  CooperPlease see General Remark SAN ANTONIORonald  CooperSAN ANTONIO,Ronald  CooperPlease see General Remark SAN ANTONIORonald  CooperPlease see General Remark SAN ANTONIOMargaret W.  CovellBOSTONChristopher William  EccleshareSee Remarks SAN ANTONIOChristopher William  EcclesharePresident & CEO, CCI SAN ANTONIOChristopher William  EccleshareSAN ANTONIO,Christopher William  EccleshareChief Executive Officer SAN ANTONIOKenneth M.  GarschinaNEW YORKKenneth M.  GarschinaNEW YORKSuzanne M  GrimesSee Remarks SAN ANTONIOScott D  HamiltonSAN ANTONIOBLAIR E  HENDRIXBOSTONHERBERT W  HILL JRiHeartCommunications, Inc.SAN ANTONIOiHeartMedia Capital I, LLCSAN ANTONIOiHeartMedia, Inc.10% Owner SAN ANTONIODOUGLAS L  JACOBSDirector PROVIDENCEDOUGLAS L  JACOBSDirector SAN ANTONIODaniel G.  JonesBOSTONPaul  KeglevicHOUSTONChester W.  KwasniakEVP and CFO-Americas SAN ANTONIOANDREW W  LEVINSteven James  MacriSAN ANTONIO,Michael E  MartinoNEW YORKMichael E  MartinoNEW YORKMASON CAPITAL MANAGEMENT LLC10% Owner NEW YORKMASON CAPITAL MANAGEMENT LLC10% Owner NEW YORKL LOWRY  MAYSSAN ANTONIOMARK P  MAYSChief Executive Officer SAN ANTONIOMARK P  MAYSChief Executive Officer SAN ANTONIOMARK P  MAYSChief Executive Officer SAN ANTONIO,RANDALL THOMAS  MAYSExecutive VP & CFO SAN ANTONIORANDALL THOMAS  MAYSExecutive VP & CFO SAN ANTONIOColine  McConvilleCEO Europe PHOENIXPAUL J  MEYERGlobal President and COO PAUL J  MEYERPresident & COO SAN ANTONIOW DOUGLAS  PARKERDirector SAN ANTONIOW DOUGLAS  PARKERDirector Vicente  PiedrahitaBOSTONROBERT W  PITTMANChairman and CEO NEW YORKROBERT W  PITTMANExecutive Chairman SAN ANTONIOJAMES M  RAINESDirector SAN ANTONIOJAMES M  RAINESDirector JAMES M  RAINESDirector OVERLAND PARKOlivia  SabineBOSTONTHOMAS R  SHEPHERDDirector STOWTHOMAS R  SHEPHERDDirector SAN ANTONIOMarsha McCombs  ShieldsDirector SAN ANTONIOMarsha McCombs  ShieldsDirector SAN ANTONIOFranklin Gay  Sisson JrChief Revenue Officer-Americas SAN ANTONIOFranklin Gay  Sisson JrGlobal Director-Sales/Mktg PHOENIXChris  TempleDirector SEATTLEChris  TempleDirector SAN ANTONIOKurt A  TingeyEVP-Domestic CFO SAN ANTONIOKurt A  TingeyEVP-Domestic CFO MESALaura Christine  ToncheffEVP-Dom R.E., Pub. Aff., Legal SAN ANTONIOLaura Christine  ToncheffEVP-Dom R.E., Pub. Aff., Legal PHOENIXDale W  TremblayDirector SAN ANTONIODale W  TremblayDirector SAN ANTONIOROBERT H  WALLS JRSee remarks HOUSTONROBERT H  WALLS JRSAN ANTONIOROBERT H  WALLS JRSee remarks SAN ANTONIOSCOTT  WELLSSee Remarks BOSTONPersons related to DOUGLAS L  JACOBS - Fortress Investment Group LLCNamePositionCityAldel LLCNEY YORKAldel LLCNEW YORKAldel LLCNEW YORKDavid B.  BarryDirector NEW YORKDavid B.  BarryDirector NEW YORKDavid B.  BarryDirector NEW YORKDavid B.  BarryDirector NEW YORKDaniel  BassChief Financial Officer NEW YORKDaniel  BassChief Financial Officer NEW YORKDaniel  BassChief Financial Officer NEW YORKDaniel  BassChief Financial Officer NEW YORKDaniel  BassChief Financial Officer NEW YORKPeter L  Briger JRPrincipal NEW YORKPeter L  Briger JRPrincipal NEW YORKBrigfam AssetPro LLCNEW YORKDavid  BrooksVP, General Counsel, Secretary NEW YORKDavid  BrooksVP, Gen Counsel & Secretary NEW YORKDavid  BrooksVP, General Counsel, Secretary NEW YORKDavid  BrooksVP, General Counsel, Secretary NEW YORKDavid  BrooksVP, General Counsel, Secretary NEW YORKJonathan  BrownChief Accounting Officer NEW YORKJonathan  BrownChief Accounting Officer NEW YORKJonathan  BrownChief Accounting Officer NEW YORKWESLEY R  EDENSPrincipal WESLEY R  EDENSPrincipal NEW YORKWESLEY R  EDENSCEO and Chairman NEW YORKWESLEY R  EDENSNEW YORKFredric B  GaronzikDirector NEW YORKRICHARD N  HAASSDirector NEW YORKRICHARD N  HAASSDirector NEW YORKRICHARD N  HAASSDirector NEW YORKRICHARD N  HAASSDirector NEW YORKRICHARD N  HAASSDirector NEW YORKRICHARD N  HAASSDirector NEW YORKRICHARD N  HAASSDirector NEW YORKDOUGLAS L  JACOBSDirector PROVIDENCEDOUGLAS L  JACOBSDirector BOSTONDOUGLAS L  JACOBSDirector NEW YORKROBERT I  KAUFFMANPresident-Europe and Director NEW YORKROBERT I  KAUFFMANPresident-Europe and Director NEW YORKJohn  KonawalikPrincipal Accounting Officer NEW YORKJohn  KonawalikPrincipal Accounting Officer NEW YORKJohn  KonawalikPrincipal Accounting Officer NEW YORKJohn  KonawalikPrincipal Accounting Officer NEW YORKJohn  KonawalikPrincipal Accounting Officer NEW YORKDANIEL H  MUDDDirector WASHINGTONDANIEL H  MUDDNEW YORKDANIEL H  MUDDChief Executive Officer NEW YORKDANIEL H  MUDDChief Executive Officer NEW YORKRANDAL A  NARDONEPrincipal and CEO RANDAL A  NARDONECOO and Director NEW YORKRANDAL A  NARDONEPrincipal and CEO NEW YORKINVESTMENT MANAGERS U.S.A.,INC.  NOMURATOKYO 103-8645INVESTMENT MANAGERS U.S.A.,INC.  NOMURADirector TOKYOINVESTMENT MANAGERS U.S.A.,INC.  NOMURA10% Owner TOKYOMichael  NovogratzPrincipal NEW YORKMichael  NovogratzPrincipal NEW YORKMichael  NovogratzPrincipal NEW YORKMichael G.  RantzDirector NEW YORKHOWARD  RUBINDirector DALLASHOWARD  RUBINDirector NEW YORKHOWARD  RUBINDirector NEW YORKHOWARD  RUBINDirector NEW YORKTakumi  ShibataNEW YORKGeorge W  Wellde JRDirector NEW YORKGeorge W  Wellde JRDirector NEW YORKGeorge W  Wellde JRDirector NEW YORKPersons related to DOUGLAS L  JACOBS - New Residential Investment Corp.NamePositionCityJonathan  BrownNEW YORKWESLEY R  EDENSDirector WESLEY R  EDENSDirector NEW YORKKevin J  FinnertyDirector NEW YORKKevin J  FinnertyDirector NEW YORKKevin J  FinnertyDirector NEW YORKSusan  GivensNEW YORKHOME LOAN SERVICING SOLUTIONS, LTD.10% Owner GEORGE TOWNDOUGLAS L  JACOBSDirector PROVIDENCEDOUGLAS L  JACOBSDirector NEW YORKCameron D.  MacDougallNEW YORKROBERT  MCGINNISDirector ATLANTANEWCASTLE INVESTMENT CORP10% Owner NEW YORKMichael  NierenbergCEO and President NEW YORKMichael  NierenbergCEO and President NEW YORK,KENNETH M  RIISNEW YORKDavid  SaltzmanDirector NEW YORKNICOLA  SANTORO JRNEW YORKAndrew  SlovesDirector NEW YORKAlan L.  TysonDirector NEWYORKAlan L.  TysonDirector NEW YORKAlan L.  TysonDirector NEW YORKRobert Joab  WilliamsNEW YORKPersons related to DOUGLAS L  JACOBS - OneMain Holdings, Inc.NamePositionCityAIG Capital CORPNEW YORKAIG Capital CORPNEW YORKAIG Capital CORPNEW YORKAMERICAN INTERNATIONAL GROUP INC NEW YORKAMERICAN INTERNATIONAL GROUP INC10% Owner NEW YORKAMERICAN INTERNATIONAL GROUP INCNEW YORKJohn Charles  AndersonEVP EVANSVILLEBradford D.  BorchersEVP, Branch Operations EVANSVILLEAngela  CelestinEVP, Human Resources EVANSVILLESean P.  Donnellyprincipal accounting officer EVANSVILLEWESLEY R  EDENSDirector NEW YORKFCFI Acquisition LLCNEW YORKFIG Corp.NEW YORKFIG LLCNEW YORKFortress Investment Group LLCNEW YORKFortress Operating Entity I LPNEW YORKROY A  GUTHRIEDirector RIVERWOODSROY A  GUTHRIEDirector EVANSVILLEMichael A  Hedlundpao, SVP & Group Controller EVANSVILLETimothy S  HoEVP, Digital Operations CHICAGOTimothy S  HoEVP of Digital Operations EVANSVILLETimothy S  HoEVP, Digital Operations EVANSVILLEDavid P.  HoganEVP, Analytics and Marketing EVANSVILLERobert  HurzelerEVP and COO EVANSVILLEDOUGLAS L  JACOBSDirector PROVIDENCEDOUGLAS L  JACOBSDirector NEW YORKWilliam E.  KandelChief Accounting Officer EVANSVILLEAnahaita N.  KotvalDirector EVANSVILLEJay N.  LevinePresident and CEO EVANSVILLERONALD M.  LOTTDirector EVANSVILLEMary H.  McDowellEVP EVANSVILLESCOTT  MCKINLAYSVP and General Counsel PLEASANTONSCOTT  MCKINLAYSVP and General Counsel EVANSVILLE(Macrina) Kgil  MinchungEVP EVANSVILLESCOTT T  PARKEREVP and CFO LIVINGSTONLawrence N.  SkeatsEVP and CAO EVANSVILLESpringleaf Financial Holdings, LLCNEW YORKRichard N.  TamborEVP, Chief Risk Officer EVANSVILLE












 










ULS License - Amateur License - WA4VOP     - JACOBS, DOUGLAS L



























FCC Home
                | Search
                | Updates
                | E-Filing
                | Initiatives
                | For Consumers
                | Find People









 












Universal Licensing System












 
              FCC >
              WTB >
              ULS >
              Online Systems >
               License Search
        

FCC Site Map   
          







 



ULS License
Amateur License - WA4VOP     - JACOBS, DOUGLAS L

          

  





      
New Search



      
    
Printable Page


      
    
Reference Copy































Call Sign
          
          
WA4VOP     

          
          
Radio Service
HA - Amateur


Status
Active 
Auth Type
Regular 


Dates


Grant

                  07/12/2007 
                  
Expiration

                  07/12/2017 
                  


Effective

                  07/12/2007 
                  
Cancellation

                   
                  










 








Licensee
                    Information








FRN

                  
                    0011843364
                    
                   
                  
Type

                      Individual
                      

                    
                  


Licensee Name




                    JACOBS, DOUGLAS L
5605 Old Hunter Road
Ooltewah, TN
37363-8791






                    

                     
                    











 








Amateur Data
                     








Operator Class


                    Advanced 
                  
Prev. Op. Class


                     
                  


Group


                    D 
                  
Prev. Call Sign

                     
                  


Eligibility
                    Code 

				  
					 
                  
 

                         
                      


Trustee/Custodian
                    (for Non-Individuals Only)


Name

                     
                  
Call Sign

                     
                  











 



















 






ULS Help



ULS Glossary
                - FAQ
                - Online Help
                - Technical Support
                - Licensing Support






ULS Online Systems



CORES
              - ULS Online Filing
              - License Search
              - Application Search
              - Archive License Search





About ULS



Privacy Statement
              - About ULS
              - ULS Home




Basic Search 


By Call Sign
By FRN
By Licensee Name

                  =
                  









 


 















FCC |
              Wireless |
              ULS |
              CORES


Help |
              Tech Support





Federal Communications Commission
      445 12th Street SW
      Washington, DC 20554



Phone: 1-877-480-3201


TTY: 1-717-338-2824



Submit Help Request








FCC Universal Licensing System (ULS): ULS Home





















Skip Navigation
Search
RSS
Updates
E-Filing
Initiatives
Consumers
Find People





Universal Licensing System




FCC Search







Skip Navigation

ULS Home


About ULS


FAQ


Batch Filing




Weekly Status Public Notices   
				
			
		
	 
				

Unlicensed Wireless Mics PN Report   
		
	 
				



Daily Transaction Files


Databases


Processing Utilities


AM Tower Locator


Public Safety and Homeland Security Bureau   
		
	 
				

ULS Site Map


 




Skip Navigation
FCC > WTB
				

		 > ULS Home
			

FCC Site Map







				
				ULS Online Systems
			



All applications are operating properly.

 




To use the FCC Online Systems, you first need to register with the FCC.
Learn more 



 





Apply for a new license, renew, modify, assign authorization, transfer 
						control, manage licenses and applications, associate call sign(s) 
						and more. 
                        Forgot Password?





 

3650



3650 Grandfathered Wireless Protection Zone Filings.
                       
					   
Public Access to 3650 Grandfathered Wireless Protection Zone Filings.






 

Narrowband



Modify Wideband Emissions: Modify licenses to narrowband emissions on frequencies that only have wideband emissions.



Remove Wideband Emissions: Modify narrowband-compliant licenses to only remove wideband emissions.  These are transition licenses with frequencies that have both a wideband and narrowband emission.
                        





 





Find licenses across all services. 




Find applications.


Find archived licenses using the enhanced license archive search.



 




Help
Obtain Official ULS Authorization
Contact Us


Systems
Pay Fees
Antenna Structure Registration (ASR)
TOWAIR
TCNS/E-106
Submit a Pleading
Hearing Aid Compatibility Status Reporting
AM Tower Locator








Alerts




No Active Alerts
																




More Alerts






Downtime Schedule


No downtimes scheduled, with the exception of the Daily downtimes.

Daily: 12 Midnight - 2 AM ET





 



FCC Home


Search


RSS


Updates


E-Filing


Initiatives


Consumers


Find People







Licensing, Technical Support and Website Issues 


						 
					



- Forgot Your Password?
- Submit eSupport request







Phone:  1-877-480-3201 
TTY:  1-717-338-2824 







Federal Communications Commission
445 12th Street SW
Washington, DC 20554

More FCC Contact Information...




Phone: 1-888-CALL-FCC (1-888-225-5322)


TTY: 1-888-TELL-FCC (1-888-835-5322)


Fax: 1-866-418-0232



- Privacy Policy

- Website Policies & Notices

- Required Browser Plug-ins

- Freedom of Information Act





FCC Universal Licensing System (ULS)




















Skip Navigation
Search
RSS
Updates
E-Filing
Initiatives
Consumers
Find People





Universal Licensing System




FCC Search







Skip Navigation

ULS Home


About ULS


FAQ


Batch Filing




Weekly Status Public Notices   
				
			
		
	 
				

Unlicensed Wireless Mics PN Report   
		
	 
				



Daily Transaction Files


Databases


Processing Utilities


AM Tower Locator


Public Safety and Homeland Security Bureau   
		
	 
				

ULS Site Map


 




Skip Navigation
FCC > WTB


FCC Site Map








Online Systems
To access specific ULS functions, choose from the links at the left of every page. 

FRN Registration
ULS Online Filing
Application Search
License Search
Archive License Search
Ownership Information Filing
Ownership Information Search
ULS Pleadings
Hearing Aid Compatibility Status Reporting

FRN Registration

Before using ULS, you must first register with the FCC's Commission Registration System (CORES) to receive an FCC Registration
      Number (FRN). Click the Register button on the ULS Home page to access CORES for your FRN. Follow the onscreen prompts and instructions, providing the password information requested
      by CORES. CORES will present you with a confirmation page. We recommend printing this page for your records -- you will need
      to use your FRN and password to apply for and manage licenses within ULS and register antenna structures within ASR. Under
      the heading, "To continue on to another FCC Filing system," choose the ULS link to return to ULS.
   
Once you have completed your registration, use the Log In button on the ULS Home page to associate call signs with your FRN. To associate ASR numbers with your FRN, use the Log In button on the ASR Home page To update your CORES registration at any time, click on the Register button on the ULS Home page or the ASR Home page. 
   
 Return to Top
ULS Online Filing

If you have registered in CORES and wish to use ULS for online application filing, click on the Log In button (located on the ULS Home page) to begin the electronic filing process. ULS will load the appropriate online application form based on the purpose of the
      application and radio service you select. For more details, please see Getting Started 2. File: Using ULS online filing. 
   
Please Note: The copy of your filing resulting from Print Preview in ULS may be submitted to the FCC for manual filing ONLY
      if it is a complete application with the addition dates printed clearly at the bottom of the page. 
   
 Return to Top
Application Search

The Application Search button (located on the ULS Home page) enables you to search for specific wireless service applications submitted within ULS. You can view applications, associated
      schedules, attachments, status information, and historical data. For more details, please see Getting Started 3. Search.
   
 Return to Top
License Search

Use the License Search button (located on the ULS Home page) to search the ULS database for specific licenses. You can view the status, special conditions, comments, technical information,
      history, and associated applications and attachments for each license. For more details, please see Getting Started 3. Search. 
   
 Return to Top
Archive License Search

Use the Archives button (located on the ULS Home page) to link to the Archive License Search. The ULS License Archive Search enables you to search for prior versions of a license
      as well as the current version. Each time a license is acted upon, the current version is captured within ULS creating a "snapshot"
      history of the license and its modifications. Searching these archived versions allows you to see the exact status of a license
      at various points in time. The search interface uses the same display as ULS Advanced License Search and allows you to search
      on many of the same criteria.  Note: The ULS data warehouse stores archived licenses for radio services converted to ULS beginning
      in August 1999 or, if the service was converted to ULS after August 1999, from the date the service was converted. Licenses
      from previous wireless databases are not archived in the license warehouse.
   
 Return to Top
Ownership Information Filing

To file Ownership Information electronically, the filer must select the Log In button (located on the ULS Home page) and login with its FCC Registration Number (FRN) and password. In addition, an FRN, but not a password, is required for
      each FCC Regulated Business and each Disclosable Interest Holder listed in an ownership filing. For detailed information regarding
      filing Ownership Information electronically, consult the online help files that are part of the electronic filing system.
      
   
 Return to Top
Ownership Information Search

Search the Universal Licensing System (ULS) database for specific wireless radio services filed ownership information using
      the Application Search button (located on the ULS Home page).  You can search by multiple criteria, and you can view ownership filing details, including FCC Regulated Businesses of
      the filer and Disclosable Interest Holders of the filer.
   
 Return to Top
ULS Pleadings

Interested parties may submit petitions and informal objections (pleadings) regarding ULS applications or licenses. If there is a pleading regarding an application or license, the ULS Application and License Search results will display
      the type of pleading, the title of the pleading, and the date the pleading was submitted. You may also view the pleading (except
      for confidential pleadings).
   
 Return to Top
Hearing Aid Compatibility Status Reporting

Under the FCC's rules, providers of digital mobile wireless services and manufacturers of wireless handsets must file annual
      reports on their offering of handsets that are compatible with hearing aids. These reports contain information about the hearing
      aid compatibility status of each handset offered, functionalities of hearing aid-compatible handsets, labeling of hearing
      aid-compatible handsets, and the filing company's consumer outreach efforts.
   
Hearing Aid Compatibility Status Reporting
 Return to Top

Last reviewed/updated on 
         6/8/2009.






FCC Home


Search


RSS


Updates


E-Filing


Initiatives


Consumers


Find People







Licensing, Technical Support and Website Issues 


						 
					



- Forgot Your Password?
- Submit eSupport request







Phone:  1-877-480-3201 
TTY:  1-717-338-2824 







Federal Communications Commission
445 12th Street SW
Washington, DC 20554

More FCC Contact Information...




Phone: 1-888-CALL-FCC (1-888-225-5322)


TTY: 1-888-TELL-FCC (1-888-835-5322)


Fax: 1-866-418-0232



- Privacy Policy

- Website Policies & Notices

- Required Browser Plug-ins

- Freedom of Information Act



